Illinois, session 104th, SB3020.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Sections 112A-3, 112A-5.5, 112A-11.5, and 6112A-14 as follows: 7    (725 ILCS 5/112A-3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 112A-3)8    Sec. 112A-3. Definitions.9    (a) In this Article:10    "Advocate" means a person whose communications with the 11victim are privileged under Section 8-802.1 or 8-802.2 of the 12Code of Civil Procedure or Section 227 of the Illinois 13Domestic Violence Act of 1986.14    "Named victim" means the person named as the victim in the 15delinquency petition or criminal prosecution.16    "Protective order" means a domestic violence order of 17protection, a civil no contact order, or a stalking no contact 18order.19    (b) For the purposes of domestic violence cases, the 20following terms shall have the following meanings in this 21Article: 22        (1) "Abuse" means physical abuse, harassment, 23    intimidation of a dependent, interference with personal   SB3020 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    liberty or willful deprivation but does not include 2    reasonable direction of a minor child by a parent or 3    person in loco parentis.4        (2) "Domestic violence" means abuse as described in 5    paragraph (1) of this subsection (b).6        (3) "Family or household members" include spouses, 7    former spouses, parents, children, stepchildren, and other 8    persons related by blood or by present or prior marriage, 9    persons who share or formerly shared a common dwelling, 10    persons who have or allegedly have a child in common, 11    persons who share or allegedly share a blood relationship 12    through a child, persons who have or have had a dating or 13    engagement relationship, persons with disabilities and 14    their personal assistants, and caregivers as defined in 15    subsection (e) of Section 12-4.4a of the Criminal Code of 16    2012. For purposes of this paragraph (3), neither a casual 17    acquaintanceship nor ordinary fraternization between 2 18    individuals in business or social contexts shall be deemed 19    to constitute a dating relationship.20        (4) "Harassment" means knowing conduct which is not 21    necessary to accomplish a purpose which is reasonable 22    under the circumstances; would cause a reasonable person 23    emotional distress; and does cause emotional distress to 24    the petitioner. Unless the presumption is rebutted by a 25    preponderance of the evidence, the following types of 26    conduct shall be presumed to cause emotional distress:  SB3020 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1            (i) creating a disturbance at petitioner's place 2        of employment or school;3            (ii) repeatedly telephoning or electronically 4        contacting the petitioner's place of employment, home, 5        mobile phone, or residence or otherwise repeatedly 6        contacting the petitioner, including through a third 7        party, by any means repeatedly telephoning 8        petitioner's place of employment, home or residence;9            (iii) repeatedly following the petitioner about in 10        a public place or places;11            (iv) repeatedly keeping the petitioner under 12        surveillance by remaining present outside his or her 13        home, school, place of employment, vehicle, or other 14        place occupied by the petitioner or by peering in the 15        petitioner's windows;16            (iv-5) using electronic means to repeatedly track, 17        monitor, surveil, record, or otherwise acquire 18        information about the petitioner's location, movement, 19        or travel patterns, including through third parties; 20            (v) improperly concealing a minor child from the 21        petitioner, repeatedly threatening to improperly 22        remove a minor child of the petitioner's from the 23        jurisdiction or from the physical care of the 24        petitioner, repeatedly threatening to conceal a minor 25        child from the petitioner, or making a single such 26        threat following an actual or attempted improper   SB3020 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        removal or concealment, unless the respondent was 2        fleeing from an incident or pattern of domestic 3        violence; or4            (vi) threatening physical force, confinement or 5        restraint on one or more occasions; .6            (vii) non-consensual dissemination or threatening 7        the non-consensual dissemination of electronically 8        generated or altered content using the image, voice, 9        or other characteristic of the petitioner to falsely 10        and deceptively impersonate the petitioner or the 11        petitioner's representative;12            (viii) non-consensual dissemination or threatening 13        the non-consensual dissemination of private sexual 14        images or electronically altered sexual images of the 15        petitioner; or16            (ix) publishing the personally identifiable 17        information of the petitioner. 18        (5) "Interference with personal liberty" means 19    committing or threatening physical abuse, harassment, 20    intimidation or willful deprivation so as to compel 21    another to engage in conduct from which she or he has a 22    right to abstain or to refrain from conduct in which she or 23    he has a right to engage.24        (6) "Intimidation of a dependent" means subjecting a 25    person who is dependent because of age, health, or 26    disability to participation in or the witnessing of:   SB3020 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    physical force against another or physical confinement or 2    restraint of another which constitutes physical abuse as 3    defined in this Article, regardless of whether the abused 4    person is a family or household member.5        (7) "Order of protection" or "domestic violence order 6    of protection" means an ex parte or final order, granted 7    pursuant to this Article, which includes any or all of the 8    remedies authorized by Section 112A-14 of this Code.9        (8) "Petitioner" may mean not only any named 10    petitioner for the domestic violence order of protection 11    and any named victim of abuse on whose behalf the petition 12    is brought, but also any other person protected by this 13    Article.14        (9) "Physical abuse" includes sexual abuse and means 15    any of the following:16            (i) knowing or reckless use of physical force, 17        confinement or restraint;18            (ii) knowing, repeated and unnecessary sleep 19        deprivation; or20            (iii) knowing or reckless conduct which creates an 21        immediate risk of physical harm.22        (9.3) "Respondent" in a petition for a domestic 23    violence order of protection means the defendant. 24        (9.5) "Stay away" means for the respondent to refrain 25    from both physical presence and nonphysical contact with 26    the petitioner whether direct, indirect (including, but   SB3020 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    not limited to, telephone calls, mail, email, faxes, and 2    written notes), or through third parties who may or may 3    not know about the domestic violence order of protection. 4        (10) "Willful deprivation" means wilfully denying a 5    person who because of age, health or disability requires 6    medication, medical care, shelter, accessible shelter or 7    services, food, therapeutic device, or other physical 8    assistance, and thereby exposing that person to the risk 9    of physical, mental or emotional harm, except with regard 10    to medical care and treatment when such dependent person 11    has expressed the intent to forgo such medical care or 12    treatment. This paragraph (10) does not create any new 13    affirmative duty to provide support to dependent persons.14    (c) For the purposes of cases involving sexual offenses, 15the following terms shall have the following meanings in this 16Article:17        (1) "Civil no contact order" means an ex parte or 18    final order granted under this Article, which includes a 19    remedy authorized by Section 112A-14.5 of this Code.20        (1.5) "Electronic" means relating to technology having 21    electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, networked, 22    optical, electromagnetic, global positioning system, or 23    similar capabilities. 24        (2) "Family or household members" include spouses, 25    parents, children, stepchildren, and persons who share a 26    common dwelling.  SB3020 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        (3) "Non-consensual" means a lack of freely given 2    agreement.3        (4) "Petitioner" means not only any named petitioner 4    for the civil no contact order and any named victim of 5    non-consensual sexual conduct or non-consensual sexual 6    penetration on whose behalf the petition is brought, but 7    includes any other person sought to be protected under 8    this Article.9        (5) "Respondent" in a petition for a civil no contact 10    order means the defendant.11        (6) "Sexual conduct" means any intentional or knowing 12    touching or fondling by the petitioner or the respondent, 13    either directly or through clothing, of the sex organs, 14    anus, or breast of the petitioner or the respondent, or 15    any part of the body of a child under 13 years of age, or 16    any transfer or transmission of semen by the respondent 17    upon any part of the clothed or unclothed body of the 18    petitioner, for the purpose of sexual gratification or 19    arousal of the petitioner or the respondent.20        (7) "Sexual penetration" means any contact, however 21    slight, between the sex organ or anus of one person by an 22    object, the sex organ, mouth or anus of another person, or 23    any intrusion, however slight, of any part of the body of 24    one person or of any animal or object into the sex organ or 25    anus of another person, including, but not limited to, 26    cunnilingus, fellatio, or anal penetration. Evidence of   SB3020 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    emission of semen is not required to prove sexual 2    penetration.3        (8) "Stay away" means to refrain from both physical 4    presence and nonphysical contact with the petitioner 5    directly, indirectly, or through third parties who may or 6    may not know of the order. "Nonphysical contact" includes, 7    but is not limited to, telephone calls, mail, e-mail, fax, 8    and written notes. 9    (d) For the purposes of cases involving stalking offenses, 10the following terms shall have the following meanings in this 11Article:12        (1) "Course of conduct" means 2 or more acts, 13    including, but not limited to, acts in which a respondent 14    directly, indirectly, or through third parties, by any 15    action, method, device, or means follows, monitors, 16    observes, surveils, threatens, or communicates to or 17    about, a person, engages in other contact, or interferes 18    with or damages a person's property or pet. A course of 19    conduct may include contact via electronic communications. 20    The incarceration of a person in a penal institution who 21    commits the course of conduct is not a bar to prosecution.22        (2) "Emotional distress" means significant mental 23    suffering, anxiety, or alarm.24        (3) "Contact" includes any contact with the victim, 25    that is initiated or continued without the victim's 26    consent, or that is in disregard of the victim's expressed   SB3020 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    desire that the contact be avoided or discontinued, 2    including, but not limited to, being in the physical 3    presence of the victim; appearing within the sight of the 4    victim; approaching or confronting the victim in a public 5    place or on private property; appearing at the workplace 6    or residence of the victim; entering onto or remaining on 7    property owned, leased, or occupied by the victim; or 8    placing an object on, or delivering an object to, property 9    owned, leased, or occupied by the victim.10        (4) "Petitioner" means any named petitioner for the 11    stalking no contact order or any named victim of stalking 12    on whose behalf the petition is brought.13        (5) "Reasonable person" means a person in the 14    petitioner's circumstances with the petitioner's knowledge 15    of the respondent and the respondent's prior acts.16        (6) "Respondent" in a petition for a civil no contact 17    order means the defendant. 18        (7) "Stalking" means engaging in a course of conduct 19    directed at a specific person, and he or she knows or 20    should know that this course of conduct would cause a 21    reasonable person to fear for his or her safety or the 22    safety of a third person or suffer emotional distress. 23    "Stalking" does not include an exercise of the right to 24    free speech or assembly that is otherwise lawful or 25    picketing occurring at the workplace that is otherwise 26    lawful and arises out of a bona fide labor dispute,   SB3020 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    including any controversy concerning wages, salaries, 2    hours, working conditions or benefits, including health 3    and welfare, sick leave, insurance, and pension or 4    retirement provisions, the making or maintaining of 5    collective bargaining agreements, and the terms to be 6    included in those agreements.7        (8) "Stalking no contact order" means an ex parte or 8    final order granted under this Article, which includes a 9    remedy authorized by Section 112A-14.7 of this Code. 10(Source: P.A. 100-199, eff. 1-1-18; 100-597, eff. 6-29-18.) 11    (725 ILCS 5/112A-5.5)12    Sec. 112A-5.5. Time for filing petition; service on 13respondent, hearing on petition, and default orders. 14    (a) A petition for a protective order may be filed at any 15time, in person or online, after a criminal charge or 16delinquency petition is filed and before the charge or 17delinquency petition is dismissed, the defendant or juvenile 18is acquitted, or the defendant or juvenile completes service 19of his or her sentence.20    (b) The request for an ex parte protective order may be 21considered without notice to the respondent under Section 22112A-17.5 of this Code.23    (c) A summons shall be issued and served for a protective 24order. The summons may be served by delivery to the respondent 25personally in open court in the criminal or juvenile   SB3020 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1delinquency proceeding, in the form prescribed by subsection 2(d) of Supreme Court Rule 101, except that it shall require the 3respondent to answer or appear within 7 days. Attachments to 4the summons shall include the petition for protective order, 5supporting affidavits, if any, and any ex parte protective 6order that has been issued.7    (d) The summons shall be served by the sheriff or other law 8enforcement officer at the earliest time available and shall 9take precedence over any other summons, except those of a 10similar emergency nature. Attachments to the summons shall 11include the petition for protective order, supporting 12affidavits, if any, and any ex parte protective order that has 13been issued. Special process servers may be appointed at any 14time and their designation shall not affect the 15responsibilities and authority of the sheriff or other 16official process servers. In a county with a population over 173,000,000, a special process server may not be appointed if 18the protective order grants the surrender of a child, the 19surrender of a firearm or Firearm Owner's Identification Card, 20or the exclusive possession of a shared residence.21    (e) If the respondent is not served within 30 days of the 22filing of the petition, the court shall schedule a court 23proceeding on the issue of service. Either the petitioner, the 24petitioner's counsel, or the State's Attorney shall appear and 25the court shall either order continued attempts at personal 26service or shall order service by publication, in accordance   SB3020 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1with Sections 2-203, 2-206, and 2-207 of the Code of Civil 2Procedure.3    (f) The request for a final protective order can be 4considered at any court proceeding in the delinquency or 5criminal case after service of the petition. If the petitioner 6has not been provided notice of the court proceeding at least 710 days in advance of the proceeding, the court shall schedule 8a hearing on the petition and provide notice to the 9petitioner.10    (f-5) A court in a county with a population above 250,000 11shall offer the option of a remote hearing to a petitioner for 12a protective order. The court shall grant a request for a 13remote hearing unless good cause is shown for denial has the 14discretion to grant or deny the request for a remote hearing. 15Each court shall determine the procedure for a remote hearing 16in accordance with Illinois Supreme Court Rule 45. The 17petitioner, applicable witness or witnesses and respondent may 18appear remotely or in person.19    The court shall issue and publish a court order, standing 20order, or local rule detailing information about the process 21for requesting and participating in a remote court appearance. 22The court order, standing order, or local rule shall be 23published on the court's website and posted on signs 24throughout the courthouse, including in the clerk's office. 25The sign shall be written in plain language and include 26information about the availability of remote court appearances   SB3020 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1and the process for requesting a remote hearing. 2    (g) Default orders.3        (1) A final domestic violence order of protection may 4    be entered by default:5            (A) for any of the remedies sought in the 6        petition, if the respondent has been served with 7        documents under subsection (b) or (c) of this Section 8        and if the respondent fails to appear on the specified 9        return date or any subsequent hearing date agreed to 10        by the petitioner and respondent or set by the court; 11        or12            (B) for any of the remedies provided under 13        paragraph (1), (2), (3), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), 14        (10), (11), (14), (15), (17), or (18) of subsection 15        (b) of Section 112A-14 of this Code, or if the 16        respondent fails to answer or appear in accordance 17        with the date set in the publication notice or the 18        return date indicated on the service of a household 19        member.20        (2) A final civil no contact order may be entered by 21    default for any of the remedies provided in Section 22    112A-14.5 of this Code, if the respondent has been served 23    with documents under subsection (b) or (c) of this 24    Section, and if the respondent fails to answer or appear 25    in accordance with the date set in the publication notice 26    or the return date indicated on the service of a household   SB3020 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    member.2        (3) A final stalking no contact order may be entered 3    by default for any of the remedies provided by Section 4    112A-14.7 of this Code, if the respondent has been served 5    with documents under subsection (b) or (c) of this Section 6    and if the respondent fails to answer or appear in 7    accordance with the date set in the publication notice or 8    the return date indicated on the service of a household 9    member. 10(Source: P.A. 102-853, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 11    (725 ILCS 5/112A-11.5)12    Sec. 112A-11.5. Issuance of protective order.13    (a) Except as provided in subsection (a-5) of this 14Section, the court shall grant the petition and enter a 15protective order if the court finds prima facie evidence that 16a crime involving domestic violence, a sexual offense, or a 17crime involving stalking has been committed. The following 18shall be considered prima facie evidence of the crime:19        (1) an information, complaint, indictment, or 20    delinquency petition, charging a crime of domestic 21    violence, a sexual offense, or stalking or charging an 22    attempt to commit a crime of domestic violence, a sexual 23    offense, or stalking;24        (2) an adjudication of delinquency, a finding of guilt 25    based upon a plea, or a finding of guilt after a trial for   SB3020 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    a crime of domestic battery, a sexual crime, or stalking 2    or an attempt to commit a crime of domestic violence, a 3    sexual offense, or stalking;4        (3) any dispositional order issued under Section 5-710 5    of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, the imposition of 6    supervision, conditional discharge, probation, periodic 7    imprisonment, parole, aftercare release, or mandatory 8    supervised release for a crime of domestic violence, a 9    sexual offense, or stalking or an attempt to commit a 10    crime of domestic violence, a sexual offense, or stalking, 11    or imprisonment in conjunction with a bond forfeiture 12    warrant; or13        (4) the entry of a protective order in a separate 14    civil case brought by the petitioner against the 15    respondent.16    (a-5) The respondent may rebut prima facie evidence of the 17crime under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Section by 18presenting evidence of a meritorious defense. The respondent 19shall file a written notice alleging a meritorious defense 20which shall be verified and supported by affidavit. The 21verified notice and affidavit shall set forth the evidence 22that will be presented at a hearing. If the court finds that 23the evidence presented at the hearing establishes a 24meritorious defense by a preponderance of the evidence, the 25court may decide not to issue a protective order. 26    (b) The petitioner shall not be denied a protective order   SB3020 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1because the petitioner or the respondent is a minor or solely 2upon the basis that the respondent or petitioner is 3incarcerated in a penal institution at the time of the 4issuance of the order.5    (c) The court, when determining whether or not to issue a 6protective order, may not require physical injury on the 7person of the victim.8    (d) If the court issues a final protective order under 9this Section, the court shall afford the petitioner and 10respondent an opportunity to be heard on the remedies 11requested in the petition. 12(Source: P.A. 100-199, eff. 1-1-18; 100-597, eff. 6-29-18.) 13    (725 ILCS 5/112A-14)  (from Ch. 38, par. 112A-14)14    Sec. 112A-14. Domestic violence order of protection; 15remedies. 16    (a) (Blank).17    (b) The court may order any of the remedies listed in this 18subsection (b). The remedies listed in this subsection (b) 19shall be in addition to other civil or criminal remedies 20available to petitioner.21        (1) Prohibition of abuse. Prohibit respondent's 22    harassment, interference with personal liberty, 23    intimidation of a dependent, physical abuse, or willful 24    deprivation, as defined in this Article, if such abuse has 25    occurred or otherwise appears likely to occur if not   SB3020 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    prohibited.2        (2) Grant of exclusive possession of residence. 3    Prohibit respondent from entering or remaining in any 4    residence, household, or premises of the petitioner, 5    including one owned or leased by respondent, if petitioner 6    has a right to occupancy thereof. The grant of exclusive 7    possession of the residence, household, or premises shall 8    not affect title to real property, nor shall the court be 9    limited by the standard set forth in subsection (c-2) of 10    Section 501 of the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 11    Marriage Act.12            (A) Right to occupancy. A party has a right to 13        occupancy of a residence or household if it is solely 14        or jointly owned or leased by that party, that party's 15        spouse, a person with a legal duty to support that 16        party or a minor child in that party's care, or by any 17        person or entity other than the opposing party that 18        authorizes that party's occupancy (e.g., a domestic 19        violence shelter). Standards set forth in subparagraph 20        (B) shall not preclude equitable relief.21            (B) Presumption of hardships. If petitioner and 22        respondent each has the right to occupancy of a 23        residence or household, the court shall balance (i) 24        the hardships to respondent and any minor child or 25        dependent adult in respondent's care resulting from 26        entry of this remedy with (ii) the hardships to   SB3020 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        petitioner and any minor child or dependent adult in 2        petitioner's care resulting from continued exposure to 3        the risk of abuse (should petitioner remain at the 4        residence or household) or from loss of possession of 5        the residence or household (should petitioner leave to 6        avoid the risk of abuse). When determining the balance 7        of hardships, the court shall also take into account 8        the accessibility of the residence or household. 9        Hardships need not be balanced if respondent does not 10        have a right to occupancy.11            The balance of hardships is presumed to favor 12        possession by petitioner unless the presumption is 13        rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence, showing 14        that the hardships to respondent substantially 15        outweigh the hardships to petitioner and any minor 16        child or dependent adult in petitioner's care. The 17        court, on the request of petitioner or on its own 18        motion, may order respondent to provide suitable, 19        accessible, alternate housing for petitioner instead 20        of excluding respondent from a mutual residence or 21        household.22        (3) Stay away order and additional prohibitions. Order 23    respondent to stay away from petitioner or any other 24    person protected by the domestic violence order of 25    protection, or prohibit respondent from entering or 26    remaining present at petitioner's school, place of   SB3020 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    employment, or other specified places at times when 2    petitioner is present, or both, if reasonable, given the 3    balance of hardships. Hardships need not be balanced for 4    the court to enter a stay away order or prohibit entry if 5    respondent has no right to enter the premises.6            (A) If a domestic violence order of protection 7        grants petitioner exclusive possession of the 8        residence, prohibits respondent from entering the 9        residence, or orders respondent to stay away from 10        petitioner or other protected persons, then the court 11        may allow respondent access to the residence to remove 12        items of clothing and personal adornment used 13        exclusively by respondent, medications, and other 14        items as the court directs. The right to access shall 15        be exercised on only one occasion as the court directs 16        and in the presence of an agreed-upon adult third 17        party or law enforcement officer.18            (B) When the petitioner and the respondent attend 19        the same public, private, or non-public elementary, 20        middle, or high school, the court when issuing a 21        domestic violence order of protection and providing 22        relief shall consider the severity of the act, any 23        continuing physical danger or emotional distress to 24        the petitioner, the educational rights guaranteed to 25        the petitioner and respondent under federal and State 26        law, the availability of a transfer of the respondent   SB3020 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        to another school, a change of placement or a change of 2        program of the respondent, the expense, difficulty, 3        and educational disruption that would be caused by a 4        transfer of the respondent to another school, and any 5        other relevant facts of the case. The court may order 6        that the respondent not attend the public, private, or 7        non-public elementary, middle, or high school attended 8        by the petitioner, order that the respondent accept a 9        change of placement or change of program, as 10        determined by the school district or private or 11        non-public school, or place restrictions on the 12        respondent's movements within the school attended by 13        the petitioner. The respondent bears the burden of 14        proving by a preponderance of the evidence that a 15        transfer, change of placement, or change of program of 16        the respondent is not available. The respondent also 17        bears the burden of production with respect to the 18        expense, difficulty, and educational disruption that 19        would be caused by a transfer of the respondent to 20        another school. A transfer, change of placement, or 21        change of program is not unavailable to the respondent 22        solely on the ground that the respondent does not 23        agree with the school district's or private or 24        non-public school's transfer, change of placement, or 25        change of program or solely on the ground that the 26        respondent fails or refuses to consent or otherwise   SB3020 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        does not take an action required to effectuate a 2        transfer, change of placement, or change of program. 3        When a court orders a respondent to stay away from the 4        public, private, or non-public school attended by the 5        petitioner and the respondent requests a transfer to 6        another attendance center within the respondent's 7        school district or private or non-public school, the 8        school district or private or non-public school shall 9        have sole discretion to determine the attendance 10        center to which the respondent is transferred. If the 11        court order results in a transfer of the minor 12        respondent to another attendance center, a change in 13        the respondent's placement, or a change of the 14        respondent's program, the parents, guardian, or legal 15        custodian of the respondent is responsible for 16        transportation and other costs associated with the 17        transfer or change.18            (C) The court may order the parents, guardian, or 19        legal custodian of a minor respondent to take certain 20        actions or to refrain from taking certain actions to 21        ensure that the respondent complies with the order. If 22        the court orders a transfer of the respondent to 23        another school, the parents, guardian, or legal 24        custodian of the respondent is responsible for 25        transportation and other costs associated with the 26        change of school by the respondent.   SB3020 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        (4) Counseling. Require or recommend the respondent to 2    undergo counseling for a specified duration with a social 3    worker, psychologist, clinical psychologist, 4    psychiatrist, family service agency, alcohol or substance 5    abuse program, mental health center guidance counselor, 6    agency providing services to elders, program designed for 7    domestic violence abusers, or any other guidance service 8    the court deems appropriate. The court may order the 9    respondent in any intimate partner relationship to report 10    to an Illinois Department of Human Services protocol 11    approved partner abuse intervention program for an 12    assessment and to follow all recommended treatment. 13        (5) Physical care and possession of the minor child. 14    In order to protect the minor child from abuse, neglect, 15    or unwarranted separation from the person who has been the 16    minor child's primary caretaker, or to otherwise protect 17    the well-being of the minor child, the court may do either 18    or both of the following: (i) grant petitioner physical 19    care or possession of the minor child, or both, or (ii) 20    order respondent to return a minor child to, or not remove 21    a minor child from, the physical care of a parent or person 22    in loco parentis.23        If the respondent is charged with abuse (as defined in 24    Section 112A-3 of this Code) of a minor child, there shall 25    be a rebuttable presumption that awarding physical care to 26    respondent would not be in the minor child's best   SB3020 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    interest.2        (6) Temporary allocation of parental responsibilities 3    and significant decision-making responsibilities. Award 4    temporary significant decision-making responsibility to 5    petitioner in accordance with this Section, the Illinois 6    Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, the Illinois 7    Parentage Act of 2015, and this State's Uniform 8    Child-Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act. 9        If the respondent is charged with abuse (as defined in 10    Section 112A-3 of this Code) of a minor child, there shall 11    be a rebuttable presumption that awarding temporary 12    significant decision-making responsibility to respondent 13    would not be in the child's best interest.14        (7) Parenting time. Determine the parenting time, if 15    any, of respondent in any case in which the court awards 16    physical care or temporary significant decision-making 17    responsibility of a minor child to petitioner. The court 18    shall restrict or deny respondent's parenting time with a 19    minor child if the court finds that respondent has done or 20    is likely to do any of the following:21            (i) abuse or endanger the minor child during 22        parenting time;23            (ii) use the parenting time as an opportunity to 24        abuse or harass petitioner or petitioner's family or 25        household members;26            (iii) improperly conceal or detain the minor   SB3020 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        child; or2            (iv) otherwise act in a manner that is not in the 3        best interests of the minor child. 4        The court shall not be limited by the standards set 5    forth in Section 603.10 of the Illinois Marriage and 6    Dissolution of Marriage Act. If the court grants parenting 7    time, the order shall specify dates and times for the 8    parenting time to take place or other specific parameters 9    or conditions that are appropriate. No order for parenting 10    time shall refer merely to the term "reasonable parenting 11    time". Petitioner may deny respondent access to the minor 12    child if, when respondent arrives for parenting time, 13    respondent is under the influence of drugs or alcohol and 14    constitutes a threat to the safety and well-being of 15    petitioner or petitioner's minor children or is behaving 16    in a violent or abusive manner. If necessary to protect 17    any member of petitioner's family or household from future 18    abuse, respondent shall be prohibited from coming to 19    petitioner's residence to meet the minor child for 20    parenting time, and the petitioner and respondent shall 21    submit to the court their recommendations for reasonable 22    alternative arrangements for parenting time. A person may 23    be approved to supervise parenting time only after filing 24    an affidavit accepting that responsibility and 25    acknowledging accountability to the court.26        (8) Removal or concealment of minor child. Prohibit   SB3020 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    respondent from removing a minor child from the State or 2    concealing the child within the State.3        (9) Order to appear. Order the respondent to appear in 4    court, alone or with a minor child, to prevent abuse, 5    neglect, removal or concealment of the child, to return 6    the child to the custody or care of the petitioner, or to 7    permit any court-ordered interview or examination of the 8    child or the respondent.9        (10) Possession of personal property. Grant petitioner 10    exclusive possession of personal property and, if 11    respondent has possession or control, direct respondent to 12    promptly make it available to petitioner, if:13            (i) petitioner, but not respondent, owns the 14        property; or15            (ii) the petitioner and respondent own the 16        property jointly; sharing it would risk abuse of 17        petitioner by respondent or is impracticable; and the 18        balance of hardships favors temporary possession by 19        petitioner.20        If petitioner's sole claim to ownership of the 21    property is that it is marital property, the court may 22    award petitioner temporary possession thereof under the 23    standards of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph only if a 24    proper proceeding has been filed under the Illinois 25    Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as now or 26    hereafter amended.  SB3020 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        No order under this provision shall affect title to 2    property.3        (11) Protection of property. Forbid the respondent 4    from taking, transferring, encumbering, concealing, 5    damaging, or otherwise disposing of any real or personal 6    property, except as explicitly authorized by the court, 7    if:8            (i) petitioner, but not respondent, owns the 9        property; or10            (ii) the petitioner and respondent own the 11        property jointly, and the balance of hardships favors 12        granting this remedy.13        If petitioner's sole claim to ownership of the 14    property is that it is marital property, the court may 15    grant petitioner relief under subparagraph (ii) of this 16    paragraph only if a proper proceeding has been filed under 17    the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as 18    now or hereafter amended.19        The court may further prohibit respondent from 20    improperly using the financial or other resources of an 21    aged member of the family or household for the profit or 22    advantage of respondent or of any other person.23        (11.5) Protection of animals. Grant the petitioner the 24    exclusive care, custody, or control of any animal owned, 25    possessed, leased, kept, or held by either the petitioner 26    or the respondent or a minor child residing in the   SB3020 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    residence or household of either the petitioner or the 2    respondent and order the respondent to stay away from the 3    animal and forbid the respondent from taking, 4    transferring, encumbering, concealing, harming, or 5    otherwise disposing of the animal. 6        (12) Order for payment of support. Order respondent to 7    pay temporary support for the petitioner or any child in 8    the petitioner's care or over whom the petitioner has been 9    allocated parental responsibility, when the respondent has 10    a legal obligation to support that person, in accordance 11    with the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage 12    Act, which shall govern, among other matters, the amount 13    of support, payment through the clerk and withholding of 14    income to secure payment. An order for child support may 15    be granted to a petitioner with lawful physical care of a 16    child, or an order or agreement for physical care of a 17    child, prior to entry of an order allocating significant 18    decision-making responsibility. Such a support order shall 19    expire upon entry of a valid order allocating parental 20    responsibility differently and vacating petitioner's 21    significant decision-making responsibility unless 22    otherwise provided in the order.23        (13) Order for payment of losses. Order respondent to 24    pay petitioner for losses suffered as a direct result of 25    the abuse. Such losses shall include, but not be limited 26    to, medical expenses, lost earnings or other support,   SB3020 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    repair or replacement of property damaged or taken, 2    reasonable attorney's fees, court costs, and moving or 3    other travel expenses, including additional reasonable 4    expenses for temporary shelter and restaurant meals.5            (i) Losses affecting family needs. If a party is 6        entitled to seek maintenance, child support, or 7        property distribution from the other party under the 8        Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as 9        now or hereafter amended, the court may order 10        respondent to reimburse petitioner's actual losses, to 11        the extent that such reimbursement would be 12        "appropriate temporary relief", as authorized by 13        subsection (a)(3) of Section 501 of that Act.14            (ii) Recovery of expenses. In the case of an 15        improper concealment or removal of a minor child, the 16        court may order respondent to pay the reasonable 17        expenses incurred or to be incurred in the search for 18        and recovery of the minor child, including, but not 19        limited to, legal fees, court costs, private 20        investigator fees, and travel costs.21        (14) Prohibition of entry. Prohibit the respondent 22    from entering or remaining in the residence or household 23    while the respondent is under the influence of alcohol or 24    drugs and constitutes a threat to the safety and 25    well-being of the petitioner or the petitioner's children.26        (14.5) Prohibition of possession of firearms and   SB3020 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    firearm parts; search and seizure of firearms and firearm 2    parts. 3            (A) Subject to the provisions of subparagraph 4        (B-2), if applicable, a person who is subject to an 5        existing domestic violence order of protection issued 6        under this Code may not lawfully possess firearms or 7        firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 8        operable firearm or a Firearm Owner's Identification 9        Card under Section 8.2 of the Firearm Owners 10        Identification Card Act.11            (B) Any firearms in the possession of the 12        respondent, except as provided in subparagraph (C) of 13        this paragraph (14.5) and subject to the provisions of 14        subparagraph (B-2), if applicable, shall be ordered by 15        the court to be surrendered to law enforcement for 16        safekeeping. Any firearms or firearm parts on the 17        respondent's person or at the place of service shall 18        be immediately surrendered to the serving officers at 19        the time of service of the order of protection, and any 20        other firearms or firearm parts shall be surrendered 21        to local law enforcement within 24 hours of service of 22        the order of protection. Any Firearm Owner's 23        Identification Card or Concealed Carry License in the 24        possession of the respondent, except as provided in 25        subparagraph (C), shall also be ordered by the court 26        to be turned over to serving officers at the time of   SB3020 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        service of the order of protection or, if not on the 2        respondent's person or at the location where the 3        respondent is served at the time of service, to local 4        law enforcement within 24 hours of service of the 5        order. The law enforcement agency shall immediately 6        mail the card, as well as any license, to the Illinois 7        State Police Firearm Owner's Identification Card 8        Office for safekeeping. 9            (B-1) Upon request of the petitioner or the 10        State's Attorney on behalf of the petitioner, a law 11        enforcement officer may seek a search warrant based on 12        the allegations in the petition for the Order of 13        Protection. 14                (i) If requested by law enforcement, the court 15            shall issue a search warrant for the seizure of 16            any firearms or firearm parts that could be 17            assembled to make an operable firearm belonging to 18            the respondent at or after entry of an order of 19            protection if the court, based upon sworn 20            testimony and governed by Sections 108-3 and 21            108-4, finds probable cause exists that: 22                    (aa) the respondent poses an immediate and 23                present credible threat to the physical safety 24                of the petitioner protected by the order of 25                protection; 26                    (bb) the respondent possesses firearms or   SB3020 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1                firearm parts that could be assembled to make 2                an operable firearm; and3                    (cc) the firearms or firearm parts that 4                could be assembled to make an operable firearm 5                are located at the residence, vehicle, or 6                other property of the respondent to be 7                searched. 8                (ii) The search warrant shall specify with 9            particularity the scope of the search, including 10            the property to be searched, and shall direct the 11            law enforcement agency to seize the respondent's 12            firearms and firearm parts that could be assembled 13            to make an operable firearm. Law enforcement shall 14            also be directed to seize into their possession 15            any Firearm Owner's Identification Card and any 16            Concealed Carry License belonging to the 17            respondent. 18                (iii) The law enforcement agency to which the 19            court has directed the warrant shall execute the 20            warrant no later than 96 hours after issuance. The 21            law enforcement agency to which the court has 22            directed the warrant may coordinate with other law 23            enforcement agencies to execute the warrant. A 24            return of the warrant shall be filed by the law 25            enforcement agency within 24 hours of execution, 26            setting forth the time, date, and location where   SB3020 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1            the warrant was executed and what items, if any, 2            were seized. If the court is not in session, the 3            return information shall be returned on the next 4            date the court is in session. Subject to the 5            provisions of this Section, peace officers shall 6            have the same authority to execute a warrant 7            issued under this subsection as a warrant issued 8            under Article 108.9                (iv) If the property to be searched is in 10            another county, the petitioner or the State's 11            Attorney may seek a search warrant in that county 12            with the law enforcement agency with primary 13            responsibility for responding to service calls at 14            the property to be searched. Regardless of whether 15            the petitioner is working with the State's 16            Attorney under subsection (d) of Section 112A-4.5, 17            the petitioner may request the State's Attorney's 18            assistance to request that the law enforcement 19            agency in the county where the property is located 20            seek a search warrant.21                (v) Service of an order of protection shall, 22            to the extent possible, be concurrent with any 23            warrant issued under this paragraph.24            (B-2) Ex parte relief may be granted under this 25        paragraph (14.5) only if the court finds that personal 26        injury to the petitioner is likely to occur if the   SB3020 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        respondent received prior notice and if the petitioner 2        has otherwise satisfied the requirements of Section 3        112A-17.5 of this Article. 4            (C) If the respondent is a peace officer as 5        defined in Section 2-13 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 6        the court shall order that any firearms used by the 7        respondent in the performance of his or her duties as a 8        peace officer be surrendered to the chief law 9        enforcement executive of the agency in which the 10        respondent is employed, who shall retain the firearms 11        for safekeeping for the duration of the domestic 12        violence order of protection.13            (D)(i) Any firearms or firearm parts that could be 14        assembled to make an operable firearm that have been 15        seized or surrendered shall be kept by the law 16        enforcement agency that took possession of the items 17        for safekeeping, except as provided in subparagraph 18        (C), (E), or (F). The period of safekeeping shall be 19        for the duration of the order of protection. Except as 20        provided in subparagraph (F), the respondent is 21        prohibited from transferring firearms or firearm parts 22        to another individual in lieu of surrender to law 23        enforcement. The law enforcement agency shall provide 24        an itemized statement of receipt to the respondent and 25        the court describing any seized or surrendered 26        firearms or firearm parts and informing the respondent   SB3020 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        that the respondent may seek the return of the 2        respondent's items at the end of the order of 3        protection. The law enforcement agency may enter 4        arrangements, as needed, with federally licensed 5        firearm dealers or other law enforcement agencies for 6        the storage of any firearms seized or surrendered 7        under this subsection.8            (ii) It is the respondent's responsibility to 9        request the return or reinstatement of any Firearm 10        Owner's Identification Card or Concealed Carry License 11        and to notify the Illinois State Police Firearm 12        Owner's Identification Card Office at the end of the 13        Order of Protection.14            (iii) At the end of the order of protection, a 15        respondent may request the return of any seized or 16        surrendered firearms or firearm parts that could be 17        assembled to make an operable firearm. Seized or 18        surrendered firearms or firearm parts shall be 19        returned within 14 days of the request to the 20        respondent, if the respondent is lawfully eligible to 21        possess firearms, or to a designated third party who 22        is lawfully eligible to possess firearms. If the 23        firearms or firearm parts cannot be returned to 24        respondent because (1) the respondent has not 25        requested the return or transfer of the firearms or 26        firearm parts as set forth in this subparagraph and   SB3020 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        (2) the respondent cannot be located or fails to 2        respond to more than 3 requests to retrieve the 3        firearms, upon petition from the appropriate law 4        enforcement agency and notice to the respondent at the 5        respondent's last known address, the court may order 6        the law enforcement agency to destroy the firearms or 7        firearm parts; use the firearms or firearm parts for 8        training purposes, or for any other application as 9        deemed appropriate by the law enforcement agency; or 10        turn over the firearms or firearm parts to a third 11        party who is lawfully eligible to possess firearms, 12        and who does not reside with respondent. 13            (E)(i) If a person other than the respondent 14        claims title to any firearms or firearm parts that 15        could be assembled to make an operable firearm seized 16        or surrendered under this subsection, the person may 17        petition the court to have the firearm and firearm 18        parts that could be assembled to make an operable 19        firearm returned to him or her with proper notice to 20        the petitioner and respondent. If, at a hearing on the 21        petition, the court determines the person to be the 22        lawful owner of the firearm and firearm parts that 23        could be assembled to make an operable firearm, the 24        firearm and firearm parts that could be assembled to 25        make an operable firearm shall be returned to the 26        person, provided that:   SB3020 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1                (aa) the firearm and firearm parts that could 2            be assembled to make an operable firearm are 3            removed from the respondent's custody, control, or 4            possession, and the lawful owner agrees to store 5            the firearm and firearm parts that could be 6            assembled to make an operable firearm in a manner 7            such that the respondent does not have access to 8            or control of the firearm and firearm parts that 9            could be assembled to make an operable firearm; 10            and 11                (bb) the firearm and firearm parts that could 12            be assembled to make an operable firearm are not 13            otherwise unlawfully possessed by the owner. 14            (ii) The person petitioning for the return of his 15        or her firearm and firearm parts that could be 16        assembled to make an operable firearm must swear or 17        affirm by affidavit that he or she:18                (aa) is the lawful owner of the firearm and 19            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 20            operable firearm;21                (bb) shall not transfer the firearm and 22            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 23            operable firearm to the respondent; and24                (cc) will store the firearm and firearm parts 25            that could be assembled to make an operable 26            firearm in a manner that the respondent does not   SB3020 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1            have access to or control of the firearm and 2            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 3            operable firearm. 4            (F)(i) The respondent may file a motion to 5        transfer, at the next scheduled hearing, any seized or 6        surrendered firearms or firearm parts to a third 7        party. Notice of the motion shall be provided to the 8        petitioner and the third party must appear at the 9        hearing. 10            (ii) The court may order transfer of the seized or 11        surrendered firearm or firearm parts only if:12                (aa) the third party transferee affirms by 13            affidavit to the open court that: 14                    (I) the third party transferee does not 15                reside with the respondent; 16                    (II) the respondent does not have access 17                to the location in which the third party 18                transferee intends to keep the firearms or 19                firearm parts; 20                    (III) the third party transferee will not 21                transfer the firearm or firearm parts to the 22                respondent or anyone who resides with the 23                respondent; 24                    (IV) the third party transferee will 25                maintain control and possession of the firearm 26                or firearm parts until otherwise ordered by   SB3020 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1                the court; and 2                    (V) the third party transferee will be 3                subject to criminal penalties for transferring 4                the firearms or firearm parts to the 5                respondent; and 6                (bb) the court finds that: 7                    (I) the respondent holds a valid Firearm 8                Owner's Identification; and9                    (II) the transfer of firearms or firearm 10                parts to the third party transferee does not 11                place the petitioner or any other protected 12                parties at any additional threat or risk of 13                harm. 14        (15) Prohibition of access to records. If a domestic 15    violence order of protection prohibits respondent from 16    having contact with the minor child, or if petitioner's 17    address is omitted under subsection (b) of Section 112A-5 18    of this Code, or if necessary to prevent abuse or wrongful 19    removal or concealment of a minor child, the order shall 20    deny respondent access to, and prohibit respondent from 21    inspecting, obtaining, or attempting to inspect or obtain, 22    school or any other records of the minor child who is in 23    the care of petitioner.24        (16) Order for payment of shelter services. Order 25    respondent to reimburse a shelter providing temporary 26    housing and counseling services to the petitioner for the   SB3020 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    cost of the services, as certified by the shelter and 2    deemed reasonable by the court.3        (17) Order for injunctive relief. Enter injunctive 4    relief necessary or appropriate to prevent further abuse 5    of a family or household member or to effectuate one of the 6    granted remedies, if supported by the balance of 7    hardships. If the harm to be prevented by the injunction 8    is abuse or any other harm that one of the remedies listed 9    in paragraphs (1) through (16) of this subsection is 10    designed to prevent, no further evidence is necessary to 11    establish that the harm is an irreparable injury.12        (18) Telephone services.13            (A) Unless a condition described in subparagraph 14        (B) of this paragraph exists, the court may, upon 15        request by the petitioner, order a wireless telephone 16        service provider to transfer to the petitioner the 17        right to continue to use a telephone number or numbers 18        indicated by the petitioner and the financial 19        responsibility associated with the number or numbers, 20        as set forth in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph. In 21        this paragraph (18), the term "wireless telephone 22        service provider" means a provider of commercial 23        mobile service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 332. The 24        petitioner may request the transfer of each telephone 25        number that the petitioner, or a minor child in his or 26        her custody, uses. The clerk of the court shall serve   SB3020 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        the order on the wireless telephone service provider's 2        agent for service of process provided to the Illinois 3        Commerce Commission. The order shall contain all of 4        the following: 5                (i) The name and billing telephone number of 6            the account holder including the name of the 7            wireless telephone service provider that serves 8            the account.9                (ii) Each telephone number that will be 10            transferred.11                (iii) A statement that the provider transfers 12            to the petitioner all financial responsibility for 13            and right to the use of any telephone number 14            transferred under this paragraph.15            (B) A wireless telephone service provider shall 16        terminate the respondent's use of, and shall transfer 17        to the petitioner use of, the telephone number or 18        numbers indicated in subparagraph (A) of this 19        paragraph unless it notifies the petitioner, within 72 20        hours after it receives the order, that one of the 21        following applies:22                (i) The account holder named in the order has 23            terminated the account.24                (ii) A difference in network technology would 25            prevent or impair the functionality of a device on 26            a network if the transfer occurs.  SB3020 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1                (iii) The transfer would cause a geographic or 2            other limitation on network or service provision 3            to the petitioner.4                (iv) Another technological or operational 5            issue would prevent or impair the use of the 6            telephone number if the transfer occurs.7            (C) The petitioner assumes all financial 8        responsibility for and right to the use of any 9        telephone number transferred under this paragraph. In 10        this paragraph, "financial responsibility" includes 11        monthly service costs and costs associated with any 12        mobile device associated with the number.13            (D) A wireless telephone service provider may 14        apply to the petitioner its routine and customary 15        requirements for establishing an account or 16        transferring a number, including requiring the 17        petitioner to provide proof of identification, 18        financial information, and customer preferences.19            (E) Except for willful or wanton misconduct, a 20        wireless telephone service provider is immune from 21        civil liability for its actions taken in compliance 22        with a court order issued under this paragraph.23            (F) All wireless service providers that provide 24        services to residential customers shall provide to the 25        Illinois Commerce Commission the name and address of 26        an agent for service of orders entered under this   SB3020 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        paragraph (18). Any change in status of the registered 2        agent must be reported to the Illinois Commerce 3        Commission within 30 days of such change. 4            (G) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall 5        maintain the list of registered agents for service for 6        each wireless telephone service provider on the 7        Commission's website. The Commission may consult with 8        wireless telephone service providers and the Circuit 9        Court Clerks on the manner in which this information 10        is provided and displayed.11        (19) Removal of harassing materials, tracking or 12    monitoring. Order the respondent to remove or delete and 13    take reasonable steps to remove or delete the harassing 14    statements or materials or delete the tracking and 15    monitoring information collected by the respondent and 16    produce sufficient evidence that such compliance has 17    occurred. 18    (c) Relevant factors; findings.19        (1) In determining whether to grant a specific remedy, 20    other than payment of support, the court shall consider 21    relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the 22    following:23            (i) the nature, frequency, severity, pattern, and 24        consequences of the respondent's past abuse of the 25        petitioner or any family or household member, 26        including the concealment of his or her location in   SB3020 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        order to evade service of process or notice, and the 2        likelihood of danger of future abuse to petitioner or 3        any member of petitioner's or respondent's family or 4        household; and5            (ii) the danger that any minor child will be 6        abused or neglected or improperly relocated from the 7        jurisdiction, improperly concealed within the State, 8        or improperly separated from the child's primary 9        caretaker.10        (2) In comparing relative hardships resulting to the 11    parties from loss of possession of the family home, the 12    court shall consider relevant factors, including, but not 13    limited to, the following:14            (i) availability, accessibility, cost, safety, 15        adequacy, location, and other characteristics of 16        alternate housing for each party and any minor child 17        or dependent adult in the party's care;18            (ii) the effect on the party's employment; and19            (iii) the effect on the relationship of the party, 20        and any minor child or dependent adult in the party's 21        care, to family, school, church, and community.22        (3) Subject to the exceptions set forth in paragraph 23    (4) of this subsection (c), the court shall make its 24    findings in an official record or in writing, and shall at 25    a minimum set forth the following:26            (i) That the court has considered the applicable   SB3020 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        relevant factors described in paragraphs (1) and (2) 2        of this subsection (c).3            (ii) Whether the conduct or actions of respondent, 4        unless prohibited, will likely cause irreparable harm 5        or continued abuse.6            (iii) Whether it is necessary to grant the 7        requested relief in order to protect petitioner or 8        other alleged abused persons.9        (4) (Blank).10        (5) Never married parties. No rights or 11    responsibilities for a minor child born outside of 12    marriage attach to a putative father until a father and 13    child relationship has been established under the Illinois 14    Parentage Act of 1984, the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, 15    the Illinois Public Aid Code, Section 12 of the Vital 16    Records Act, the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, the Probate 17    Act of 1975, the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, 18    the Expedited Child Support Act of 1990, any judicial, 19    administrative, or other act of another state or 20    territory, any other statute of this State, or by any 21    foreign nation establishing the father and child 22    relationship, any other proceeding substantially in 23    conformity with the federal Personal Responsibility and 24    Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, or when both 25    parties appeared in open court or at an administrative 26    hearing acknowledging under oath or admitting by   SB3020 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    affirmation the existence of a father and child 2    relationship. Absent such an adjudication, no putative 3    father shall be granted temporary allocation of parental 4    responsibilities, including parenting time with the minor 5    child, or physical care and possession of the minor child, 6    nor shall an order of payment for support of the minor 7    child be entered.8    (d) Balance of hardships; findings. If the court finds 9that the balance of hardships does not support the granting of 10a remedy governed by paragraph (2), (3), (10), (11), or (16) of 11subsection (b) of this Section, which may require such 12balancing, the court's findings shall so indicate and shall 13include a finding as to whether granting the remedy will 14result in hardship to respondent that would substantially 15outweigh the hardship to petitioner from denial of the remedy. 16The findings shall be an official record or in writing.17    (e) Denial of remedies. Denial of any remedy shall not be 18based, in whole or in part, on evidence that:19        (1) respondent has cause for any use of force, unless 20    that cause satisfies the standards for justifiable use of 21    force provided by Article 7 of the Criminal Code of 2012;22        (2) respondent was voluntarily intoxicated;23        (3) petitioner acted in self-defense or defense of 24    another, provided that, if petitioner utilized force, such 25    force was justifiable under Article 7 of the Criminal Code 26    of 2012;   SB3020 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        (4) petitioner did not act in self-defense or defense 2    of another;3        (5) petitioner left the residence or household to 4    avoid further abuse by respondent;5        (6) petitioner did not leave the residence or 6    household to avoid further abuse by respondent; or 7        (7) conduct by any family or household member excused 8    the abuse by respondent, unless that same conduct would 9    have excused such abuse if the parties had not been family 10    or household members.11(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 12102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-1065, eff. 5-11-25.) 13    Section 10. The Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 is 14amended by changing Sections 103, 201, 212, 214, and 220 as 15follows: 16    (750 ILCS 60/103)  (from Ch. 40, par. 2311-3)17    Sec. 103. Definitions. For the purposes of this Act, the 18following terms shall have the following meanings:19    (1) "Abuse" means physical abuse, harassment, intimidation 20of a dependent, interference with personal liberty or willful 21deprivation but does not include reasonable direction of a 22minor child by a parent or person in loco parentis.23    (2) "Adult with disabilities" means an elder adult with 24disabilities or a high-risk adult with disabilities. A person   SB3020 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1may be an adult with disabilities for purposes of this Act even 2though he or she has never been adjudicated an incompetent 3adult. However, no court proceeding may be initiated or 4continued on behalf of an adult with disabilities over that 5adult's objection, unless such proceeding is approved by his 6or her legal guardian, if any.7    (3) "Domestic violence" means abuse as defined in 8paragraph (1).9    (4) "Elder adult with disabilities" means an adult 10prevented by advanced age from taking appropriate action to 11protect himself or herself from abuse by a family or household 12member.13    (4.5) "Electronic" means relating to technology having 14electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, networked, optical, 15electromagnetic, global positioning system, or similar 16capabilities. 17    (5) "Exploitation" means the illegal, including tortious, 18use of a high-risk adult with disabilities or of the assets or 19resources of a high-risk adult with disabilities. Exploitation 20includes, but is not limited to, the misappropriation of 21assets or resources of a high-risk adult with disabilities by 22undue influence, by breach of a fiduciary relationship, by 23fraud, deception, or extortion, or the use of such assets or 24resources in a manner contrary to law.25    (6) "Family or household members" include spouses, former 26spouses, parents, children, stepchildren and other persons   SB3020 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1related by blood or by present or prior marriage, persons who 2share or formerly shared a common dwelling, persons who have 3or allegedly have a child in common, persons who share or 4allegedly share a blood relationship through a child, persons 5who have or have had a dating or engagement relationship, 6persons with disabilities and their personal assistants, and 7caregivers as defined in Section 12-4.4a of the Criminal Code 8of 2012. For purposes of this paragraph, neither a casual 9acquaintanceship nor ordinary fraternization between 2 10individuals in business or social contexts shall be deemed to 11constitute a dating relationship. In the case of a high-risk 12adult with disabilities, "family or household members" 13includes any person who has the responsibility for a high-risk 14adult as a result of a family relationship or who has assumed 15responsibility for all or a portion of the care of a high-risk 16adult with disabilities voluntarily, or by express or implied 17contract, or by court order.18    (7) "Harassment" means knowing conduct which is not 19necessary to accomplish a purpose that is reasonable under the 20circumstances; would cause a reasonable person emotional 21distress; and does cause emotional distress to the petitioner. 22Unless the presumption is rebutted by a preponderance of the 23evidence, the following types of conduct shall be presumed to 24cause emotional distress: 25        (i) creating a disturbance at petitioner's place of 26    employment or school;   SB3020 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        (ii) repeatedly telephoning or electronically 2    contacting the petitioner's place of employment, home, 3    mobile phone, or residence or otherwise repeatedly 4    contacting the petitioner, including through a third 5    party, by any means repeatedly telephoning petitioner's 6    place of employment, home or residence; 7        (iii) repeatedly following the petitioner about in a 8    public place or places; 9        (iv) repeatedly keeping the petitioner under 10    surveillance by remaining present outside his or her home, 11    school, place of employment, vehicle, or other place 12    occupied by the petitioner or by peering in the 13    petitioner's windows;14        (iv-5) using electronic means to repeatedly track, 15    monitor, surveil, record, or otherwise acquire information 16    about the petitioner's location, movement, or travel 17    patterns, including through third parties; 18        (v) improperly concealing a minor child from the 19    petitioner, repeatedly threatening to improperly remove a 20    minor child of the petitioner's from the jurisdiction or 21    from the physical care of the petitioner, repeatedly 22    threatening to conceal a minor child from the petitioner, 23    or making a single such threat following an actual or 24    attempted improper removal or concealment, unless the 25    respondent was fleeing an incident or pattern of domestic 26    violence; or  SB3020 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        (vi) threatening physical force, confinement or 2    restraint on one or more occasions; .3        (vii) non-consensual dissemination or threatening the 4    non-consensual dissemination of electronically generated 5    or altered content using the image, voice, or other 6    characteristic of the petitioner to falsely and 7    deceptively impersonate the petitioner or the petitioner's 8    representative;9        (viii) non-consensual dissemination or threatening the 10    non-consensual dissemination of private sexual images or 11    electronically altered sexual images of the petitioner; or12        (ix) publishing the personally identifiable 13    information of the petitioner. 14    (8) "High-risk adult with disabilities" means a person 15aged 18 or over whose physical or mental disability impairs 16his or her ability to seek or obtain protection from abuse, 17neglect, or exploitation.18    (9) "Interference with personal liberty" means committing 19or threatening physical abuse, harassment, intimidation or 20willful deprivation so as to compel another to engage in 21conduct from which she or he has a right to abstain or to 22refrain from conduct in which she or he has a right to engage.23    (10) "Intimidation of a dependent" means subjecting a 24person who is dependent because of age, health or disability 25to participation in or the witnessing of: physical force 26against another or physical confinement or restraint of   SB3020 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1another which constitutes physical abuse as defined in this 2Act, regardless of whether the abused person is a family or 3household member.4    (11) (A) "Neglect" means the failure to exercise that 5degree of care toward a high-risk adult with disabilities 6which a reasonable person would exercise under the 7circumstances and includes but is not limited to: 8        (i) the failure to take reasonable steps to protect a 9    high-risk adult with disabilities from acts of abuse; 10        (ii) the repeated, careless imposition of unreasonable 11    confinement; 12        (iii) the failure to provide food, shelter, clothing, 13    and personal hygiene to a high-risk adult with 14    disabilities who requires such assistance; 15        (iv) the failure to provide medical and rehabilitative 16    care for the physical and mental health needs of a 17    high-risk adult with disabilities; or 18        (v) the failure to protect a high-risk adult with 19    disabilities from health and safety hazards.20    (B) Nothing in this subsection (10) shall be construed to 21impose a requirement that assistance be provided to a 22high-risk adult with disabilities over his or her objection in 23the absence of a court order, nor to create any new affirmative 24duty to provide support to a high-risk adult with 25disabilities.26    (12) "Order of protection" means an emergency order,   SB3020 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1interim order or plenary order, granted pursuant to this Act, 2which includes any or all of the remedies authorized by 3Section 214 of this Act.4    (13) "Petitioner" may mean not only any named petitioner 5for the order of protection and any named victim of abuse on 6whose behalf the petition is brought, but also any other 7person protected by this Act.8    (14) "Physical abuse" includes sexual abuse and means any 9of the following: 10        (i) knowing or reckless use of physical force, 11    confinement or restraint; 12        (ii) knowing, repeated and unnecessary sleep 13    deprivation; or 14        (iii) knowing or reckless conduct which creates an 15    immediate risk of physical harm.16    (14.5) "Stay away" means for the respondent to refrain 17from both physical presence and nonphysical contact with the 18petitioner whether direct, indirect (including, but not 19limited to, telephone calls, mail, email, faxes, and written 20notes), or through third parties who may or may not know about 21the order of protection. 22    (15) "Willful deprivation" means wilfully denying a person 23who because of age, health or disability requires medication, 24medical care, shelter, accessible shelter or services, food, 25therapeutic device, or other physical assistance, and thereby 26exposing that person to the risk of physical, mental or   SB3020 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1emotional harm, except with regard to medical care or 2treatment when the dependent person has expressed an intent to 3forgo such medical care or treatment. This paragraph does not 4create any new affirmative duty to provide support to 5dependent persons.6(Source: P.A. 96-1551, eff. 7-1-11; 97-1150, eff. 1-25-13.) 7    (750 ILCS 60/201)  (from Ch. 40, par. 2312-1)8    Sec. 201. Persons protected by this Act. 9    (a) The following persons are protected by this Act:10        (i) any person abused by a family or household member;11        (ii) any high-risk adult with disabilities who is 12    abused, neglected, or exploited by a family or household 13    member;14        (iii) any minor child or dependent adult in the care 15    of such person;16        (iv) any person residing or employed at a private home 17    or public shelter which is housing an abused family or 18    household member; and19        (v) any of the following persons if the person is 20    abused by a family or household member of a child:21            (A) a foster parent of that child if the child has 22        been placed in the foster parent's home by the 23        Department of Children and Family Services or by 24        another state's public child welfare agency;25            (B) a legally appointed guardian or legally   SB3020 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        appointed custodian of that child;2            (C) an adoptive parent of that child; or3            (D) a prospective adoptive parent of that child if 4        the child has been placed in the prospective adoptive 5        parent's home pursuant to the Adoption Act or pursuant 6        to another state's law.7        For purposes of this paragraph (a)(v), individuals who 8    would have been considered "family or household members" 9    of the child under subsection (6) of Section 103 of this 10    Act before a termination of the parental rights with 11    respect to the child continue to meet the definition of 12    "family or household members" of the child. 13    (b) A petition for an order of protection may be filed 14only:15        (i) by a person who has been abused by a family or 16    household member or by any person on behalf of a minor 17    child or an adult who has been abused by a family or 18    household member and who, because of age, health, 19    disability, or inaccessibility, cannot file the petition;20        (ii) by any person on behalf of a high-risk adult with 21    disabilities who has been abused, neglected, or exploited 22    by a family or household member;23        (iii) by any of the following persons if the person is 24    abused by a family or household member of a child:25            (A) a foster parent of that child if the child has 26        been placed in the foster parent's home by the   SB3020 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        Department of Children and Family Services or by 2        another state's public child welfare agency;3            (B) a legally appointed guardian or legally 4        appointed custodian of that child;5            (C) an adoptive parent of that child;6            (D) a prospective adoptive parent of that child if 7        the child has been placed in the prospective adoptive 8        parent's home pursuant to the Adoption Act or pursuant 9        to another state's law.10        For purposes of this paragraph (b)(iii), individuals 11    who would have been considered "family or household 12    members" of the child under subsection (6) of Section 103 13    of this Act before a termination of the parental rights 14    with respect to the child continue to meet the definition 15    of "family or household members" of the child;16        (iv) by a crime victim who was abused by a family or 17    household member an offender prior to the incarceration of 18    the offender in a penal institution and such offender is 19    incarcerated in a penal institution at the time of the 20    filing of the petition; or21        (v) by any person who has previously suffered abuse by 22    a family or household member person convicted of (1) 23    domestic battery, aggravated domestic battery, aggravated 24    battery, or any other offense that would constitute 25    domestic violence or (2) a violent crime, as defined in 26    Section 3 of the Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses   SB3020 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    Act, committed against another person.2    A petition for an order of protection may not be denied 3solely upon the basis that the respondent or petitioner is 4incarcerated in a penal institution at the time of the filing 5of the petition. 6    (c) Any petition properly filed under this Act may seek 7protection for any additional persons protected by this Act.8(Source: P.A. 104-11, eff. 6-20-25.) 9    (750 ILCS 60/212)  (from Ch. 40, par. 2312-12)10    Sec. 212. Hearings. 11    (a) A petition for an order of protection shall be treated 12as an expedited proceeding, and no court shall transfer or 13otherwise decline to decide all or part of such petition 14except as otherwise provided herein. Nothing in this Section 15shall prevent the court from reserving issues when 16jurisdiction or notice requirements are not met.17    (b) Any court or a division thereof which ordinarily does 18not decide matters of child custody and family support may 19decline to decide contested issues of physical care, custody, 20visitation, or family support unless a decision on one or more 21of those contested issues is necessary to avoid the risk of 22abuse, neglect, removal from the State or concealment within 23the State of the child or of separation of the child from the 24primary caretaker. If the court or division thereof has 25declined to decide any or all of these issues, then it shall   SB3020 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1transfer all undecided issues to the appropriate court or 2division. In the event of such a transfer, a government 3attorney involved in the criminal prosecution may, but need 4not, continue to offer counsel to the petitioner on 5transferred matters.6    (c) If the court transfers or otherwise declines to decide 7any issue, judgment on that issue shall be expressly reserved 8and ruling on other issues shall not be delayed or declined.9    (d) A court in a county with a population above 250,000 10shall offer the option of a remote hearing to a petitioner for 11an order of protection. The court shall grant a request for a 12remote hearing unless good cause is shown for denial has the 13discretion to grant or deny the request for a remote hearing. 14Each court shall determine the procedure for a remote hearing 15in accordance with Illinois Supreme Court Rule 45. The 16petitioner, applicable witness or witnesses and respondent may 17appear remotely or in person.18    The court shall issue and publish a court order, standing 19order, or local rule detailing information about the process 20for requesting and participating in a remote court appearance. 21The court order, standing order, or local rule shall be 22published on the court's website and posted on signs 23throughout the courthouse, including in the clerk's office. 24The sign shall be written in plain language and include 25information about the availability of remote court appearances 26and the process for requesting a remote hearing.   SB3020 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1(Source: P.A. 102-853, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 2    (750 ILCS 60/214)  (from Ch. 40, par. 2312-14)3    Sec. 214. Order of protection; remedies. 4    (a) Issuance of order. If the court finds that petitioner 5has been abused by a family or household member or that 6petitioner is a high-risk adult who has been abused, 7neglected, or exploited, as defined in this Act, an order of 8protection prohibiting the abuse, neglect, or exploitation 9shall issue; provided that petitioner must also satisfy the 10requirements of one of the following Sections, as appropriate: 11Section 217 on emergency orders, Section 218 on interim 12orders, or Section 219 on plenary orders. Petitioner shall not 13be denied an order of protection because petitioner or 14respondent is a minor. The court, when determining whether or 15not to issue an order of protection, shall not require 16physical manifestations of abuse on the person of the victim. 17Modification and extension of prior orders of protection shall 18be in accordance with this Act.19    (b) Remedies and standards. The remedies to be included in 20an order of protection shall be determined in accordance with 21this Section and one of the following Sections, as 22appropriate: Section 217 on emergency orders, Section 218 on 23interim orders, and Section 219 on plenary orders. The 24remedies listed in this subsection shall be in addition to 25other civil or criminal remedies available to petitioner.  SB3020 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        (1) Prohibition of abuse, neglect, or exploitation. 2    Prohibit respondent's harassment, interference with 3    personal liberty, intimidation of a dependent, physical 4    abuse, or willful deprivation, neglect or exploitation, as 5    defined in this Act, or stalking of the petitioner, as 6    defined in Section 12-7.3 of the Criminal Code of 2012, if 7    such abuse, neglect, exploitation, or stalking has 8    occurred or otherwise appears likely to occur if not 9    prohibited.10        (2) Grant of exclusive possession of residence. 11    Prohibit respondent from entering or remaining in any 12    residence, household, or premises of the petitioner, 13    including one owned or leased by respondent, if petitioner 14    has a right to occupancy thereof. The grant of exclusive 15    possession of the residence, household, or premises shall 16    not affect title to real property, nor shall the court be 17    limited by the standard set forth in subsection (c-2) of 18    Section 501 of the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 19    Marriage Act.20            (A) Right to occupancy. A party has a right to 21        occupancy of a residence or household if it is solely 22        or jointly owned or leased by that party, that party's 23        spouse, a person with a legal duty to support that 24        party or a minor child in that party's care, or by any 25        person or entity other than the opposing party that 26        authorizes that party's occupancy (e.g., a domestic   SB3020 Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        violence shelter). Standards set forth in subparagraph 2        (B) shall not preclude equitable relief.3            (B) Presumption of hardships. If petitioner and 4        respondent each has the right to occupancy of a 5        residence or household, the court shall balance (i) 6        the hardships to respondent and any minor child or 7        dependent adult in respondent's care resulting from 8        entry of this remedy with (ii) the hardships to 9        petitioner and any minor child or dependent adult in 10        petitioner's care resulting from continued exposure to 11        the risk of abuse (should petitioner remain at the 12        residence or household) or from loss of possession of 13        the residence or household (should petitioner leave to 14        avoid the risk of abuse). When determining the balance 15        of hardships, the court shall also take into account 16        the accessibility of the residence or household. 17        Hardships need not be balanced if respondent does not 18        have a right to occupancy.19            The balance of hardships is presumed to favor 20        possession by petitioner unless the presumption is 21        rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence, showing 22        that the hardships to respondent substantially 23        outweigh the hardships to petitioner and any minor 24        child or dependent adult in petitioner's care. The 25        court, on the request of petitioner or on its own 26        motion, may order respondent to provide suitable,   SB3020 Enrolled- 61 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        accessible, alternate housing for petitioner instead 2        of excluding respondent from a mutual residence or 3        household.4        (3) Stay away order and additional prohibitions. Order 5    respondent to stay away from petitioner or any other 6    person protected by the order of protection, or prohibit 7    respondent from entering or remaining present at 8    petitioner's school, place of employment, or other 9    specified places at times when petitioner is present, or 10    both, if reasonable, given the balance of hardships. 11    Hardships need not be balanced for the court to enter a 12    stay away order or prohibit entry if respondent has no 13    right to enter the premises.14            (A) If an order of protection grants petitioner 15        exclusive possession of the residence, or prohibits 16        respondent from entering the residence, or orders 17        respondent to stay away from petitioner or other 18        protected persons, then the court may allow respondent 19        access to the residence to remove items of clothing 20        and personal adornment used exclusively by respondent, 21        medications, and other items as the court directs. The 22        right to access shall be exercised on only one 23        occasion as the court directs and in the presence of an 24        agreed-upon adult third party or law enforcement 25        officer.26            (B) When the petitioner and the respondent attend   SB3020 Enrolled- 62 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        the same public, private, or non-public elementary, 2        middle, or high school, the court when issuing an 3        order of protection and providing relief shall 4        consider the severity of the act, any continuing 5        physical danger or emotional distress to the 6        petitioner, the educational rights guaranteed to the 7        petitioner and respondent under federal and State law, 8        the availability of a transfer of the respondent to 9        another school, a change of placement or a change of 10        program of the respondent, the expense, difficulty, 11        and educational disruption that would be caused by a 12        transfer of the respondent to another school, and any 13        other relevant facts of the case. The court may order 14        that the respondent not attend the public, private, or 15        non-public elementary, middle, or high school attended 16        by the petitioner, order that the respondent accept a 17        change of placement or change of program, as 18        determined by the school district or private or 19        non-public school, or place restrictions on the 20        respondent's movements within the school attended by 21        the petitioner. The respondent bears the burden of 22        proving by a preponderance of the evidence that a 23        transfer, change of placement, or change of program of 24        the respondent is not available. The respondent also 25        bears the burden of production with respect to the 26        expense, difficulty, and educational disruption that   SB3020 Enrolled- 63 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        would be caused by a transfer of the respondent to 2        another school. A transfer, change of placement, or 3        change of program is not unavailable to the respondent 4        solely on the ground that the respondent does not 5        agree with the school district's or private or 6        non-public school's transfer, change of placement, or 7        change of program or solely on the ground that the 8        respondent fails or refuses to consent or otherwise 9        does not take an action required to effectuate a 10        transfer, change of placement, or change of program. 11        When a court orders a respondent to stay away from the 12        public, private, or non-public school attended by the 13        petitioner and the respondent requests a transfer to 14        another attendance center within the respondent's 15        school district or private or non-public school, the 16        school district or private or non-public school shall 17        have sole discretion to determine the attendance 18        center to which the respondent is transferred. In the 19        event the court order results in a transfer of the 20        minor respondent to another attendance center, a 21        change in the respondent's placement, or a change of 22        the respondent's program, the parents, guardian, or 23        legal custodian of the respondent is responsible for 24        transportation and other costs associated with the 25        transfer or change. 26            (C) The court may order the parents, guardian, or   SB3020 Enrolled- 64 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        legal custodian of a minor respondent to take certain 2        actions or to refrain from taking certain actions to 3        ensure that the respondent complies with the order. In 4        the event the court orders a transfer of the 5        respondent to another school, the parents, guardian, 6        or legal custodian of the respondent is responsible 7        for transportation and other costs associated with the 8        change of school by the respondent. 9        (4) Counseling. Require or recommend the respondent to 10    undergo counseling for a specified duration with a social 11    worker, psychologist, clinical psychologist, 12    psychiatrist, family service agency, alcohol or substance 13    abuse program, mental health center guidance counselor, 14    agency providing services to elders, program designed for 15    domestic violence abusers or any other guidance service 16    the court deems appropriate. The Court may order the 17    respondent in any intimate partner relationship to report 18    to an Illinois Department of Human Services protocol 19    approved partner abuse intervention program for an 20    assessment and to follow all recommended treatment. 21        (5) Physical care and possession of the minor child. 22    In order to protect the minor child from abuse, neglect, 23    or unwarranted separation from the person who has been the 24    minor child's primary caretaker, or to otherwise protect 25    the well-being of the minor child, the court may do either 26    or both of the following: (i) grant petitioner physical   SB3020 Enrolled- 65 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    care or possession of the minor child, or both, or (ii) 2    order respondent to return a minor child to, or not remove 3    a minor child from, the physical care of a parent or person 4    in loco parentis.5        If a court finds, after a hearing, that respondent has 6    committed abuse (as defined in Section 103) of a minor 7    child, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that 8    awarding physical care to respondent would not be in the 9    minor child's best interest.10        (6) Temporary allocation of parental responsibilities: 11    significant decision-making. Award temporary 12    decision-making responsibility to petitioner in accordance 13    with this Section, the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution 14    of Marriage Act, the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, and 15    this State's Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and 16    Enforcement Act. 17        If a court finds, after a hearing, that respondent has 18    committed abuse (as defined in Section 103) of a minor 19    child, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that 20    awarding temporary significant decision-making 21    responsibility to respondent would not be in the child's 22    best interest.23        (7) Parenting time. Determine the parenting time, if 24    any, of respondent in any case in which the court awards 25    physical care or allocates temporary significant 26    decision-making responsibility of a minor child to   SB3020 Enrolled- 66 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    petitioner. The court shall restrict or deny respondent's 2    parenting time with a minor child if the court finds that 3    respondent has done or is likely to do any of the 4    following: (i) abuse or endanger the minor child during 5    parenting time; (ii) use the parenting time as an 6    opportunity to abuse or harass petitioner or petitioner's 7    family or household members; (iii) improperly conceal or 8    detain the minor child; or (iv) otherwise act in a manner 9    that is not in the best interests of the minor child. The 10    court shall not be limited by the standards set forth in 11    Section 603.10 of the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 12    Marriage Act. If the court grants parenting time, the 13    order shall specify dates and times for the parenting time 14    to take place or other specific parameters or conditions 15    that are appropriate. No order for parenting time shall 16    refer merely to the term "reasonable parenting time".17        Petitioner may deny respondent access to the minor 18    child if, when respondent arrives for parenting time, 19    respondent is under the influence of drugs or alcohol and 20    constitutes a threat to the safety and well-being of 21    petitioner or petitioner's minor children or is behaving 22    in a violent or abusive manner.23        If necessary to protect any member of petitioner's 24    family or household from future abuse, respondent shall be 25    prohibited from coming to petitioner's residence to meet 26    the minor child for parenting time, and the parties shall   SB3020 Enrolled- 67 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    submit to the court their recommendations for reasonable 2    alternative arrangements for parenting time. A person may 3    be approved to supervise parenting time only after filing 4    an affidavit accepting that responsibility and 5    acknowledging accountability to the court.6        (8) Removal or concealment of minor child. Prohibit 7    respondent from removing a minor child from the State or 8    concealing the child within the State.9        (9) Order to appear. Order the respondent to appear in 10    court, alone or with a minor child, to prevent abuse, 11    neglect, removal or concealment of the child, to return 12    the child to the custody or care of the petitioner or to 13    permit any court-ordered interview or examination of the 14    child or the respondent.15        (10) Possession of personal property. Grant petitioner 16    exclusive possession of personal property and, if 17    respondent has possession or control, direct respondent to 18    promptly make it available to petitioner, if:19            (i) petitioner, but not respondent, owns the 20        property; or21            (ii) the parties own the property jointly; sharing 22        it would risk abuse of petitioner by respondent or is 23        impracticable; and the balance of hardships favors 24        temporary possession by petitioner.25        If petitioner's sole claim to ownership of the 26    property is that it is marital property, the court may   SB3020 Enrolled- 68 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    award petitioner temporary possession thereof under the 2    standards of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph only if a 3    proper proceeding has been filed under the Illinois 4    Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as now or 5    hereafter amended.6        No order under this provision shall affect title to 7    property.8        (11) Protection of property. Forbid the respondent 9    from taking, transferring, encumbering, concealing, 10    damaging or otherwise disposing of any real or personal 11    property, except as explicitly authorized by the court, 12    if:13            (i) petitioner, but not respondent, owns the 14        property; or15            (ii) the parties own the property jointly, and the 16        balance of hardships favors granting this remedy.17        If petitioner's sole claim to ownership of the 18    property is that it is marital property, the court may 19    grant petitioner relief under subparagraph (ii) of this 20    paragraph only if a proper proceeding has been filed under 21    the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as 22    now or hereafter amended.23        The court may further prohibit respondent from 24    improperly using the financial or other resources of an 25    aged member of the family or household for the profit or 26    advantage of respondent or of any other person.  SB3020 Enrolled- 69 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        (11.5) Protection of animals. Grant the petitioner the 2    exclusive care, custody, or control of any animal owned, 3    possessed, leased, kept, or held by either the petitioner 4    or the respondent or a minor child residing in the 5    residence or household of either the petitioner or the 6    respondent and order the respondent to stay away from the 7    animal and forbid the respondent from taking, 8    transferring, encumbering, concealing, harming, or 9    otherwise disposing of the animal. 10        (12) Order for payment of support. Order respondent to 11    pay temporary support for the petitioner or any child in 12    the petitioner's care or over whom the petitioner has been 13    allocated parental responsibility, when the respondent has 14    a legal obligation to support that person, in accordance 15    with the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage 16    Act, which shall govern, among other matters, the amount 17    of support, payment through the clerk and withholding of 18    income to secure payment. An order for child support may 19    be granted to a petitioner with lawful physical care of a 20    child, or an order or agreement for physical care of a 21    child, prior to entry of an order allocating significant 22    decision-making responsibility. Such a support order shall 23    expire upon entry of a valid order allocating parental 24    responsibility differently and vacating the petitioner's 25    significant decision-making authority, unless otherwise 26    provided in the order.  SB3020 Enrolled- 70 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        (13) Order for payment of losses. Order respondent to 2    pay petitioner for losses suffered as a direct result of 3    the abuse, neglect, or exploitation. Such losses shall 4    include, but not be limited to, medical expenses, lost 5    earnings or other support, repair or replacement of 6    property damaged or taken, reasonable attorney's fees, 7    court costs and moving or other travel expenses, including 8    additional reasonable expenses for temporary shelter and 9    restaurant meals.10            (i) Losses affecting family needs. If a party is 11        entitled to seek maintenance, child support or 12        property distribution from the other party under the 13        Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as 14        now or hereafter amended, the court may order 15        respondent to reimburse petitioner's actual losses, to 16        the extent that such reimbursement would be 17        "appropriate temporary relief", as authorized by 18        subsection (a)(3) of Section 501 of that Act.19            (ii) Recovery of expenses. In the case of an 20        improper concealment or removal of a minor child, the 21        court may order respondent to pay the reasonable 22        expenses incurred or to be incurred in the search for 23        and recovery of the minor child, including but not 24        limited to legal fees, court costs, private 25        investigator fees, and travel costs.26        (14) Prohibition of entry. Prohibit the respondent   SB3020 Enrolled- 71 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    from entering or remaining in the residence or household 2    while the respondent is under the influence of alcohol or 3    drugs and constitutes a threat to the safety and 4    well-being of the petitioner or the petitioner's children.5        (14.5) Prohibition of possession of firearms and 6    firearm parts; search and seizure of firearms and firearms 7    parts.8            (A)(i) Prohibit a respondent against whom an 9        emergency, interim, or plenary order of protection was 10        issued from possessing, during the duration of the 11        order, any firearms or firearm parts that could be 12        assembled into an operable firearm if a search warrant 13        is issued under (A-1) or the order:14                (aa) was issued after a hearing of which such 15            person received actual notice, and at which such 16            person had an opportunity to participate, or the 17            petitioner has satisfied the requirements of 18            Section 217;19                (bb) restrains such person from using physical 20            force; harassing, stalking, or threatening an 21            intimate partner of such person or child of such 22            intimate partner or person; or engaging in other 23            conduct that would place an intimate partner in 24            reasonable fear of bodily injury to the partner or 25            child; and26                (cc) includes a finding that such person   SB3020 Enrolled- 72 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1            represents a credible threat to the physical 2            safety of such intimate partner or child.3            (ii) The court shall order any respondent 4        prohibited from possessing firearms under item (i) of 5        subparagraph (A) to surrender any firearms or firearm 6        parts that could be assembled to make an operable 7        firearm. Any firearms or firearm parts on the 8        respondent's person or at the place of service shall 9        be surrendered to the serving officers at the time of 10        service of the order of protection, and any other 11        firearms or firearm parts shall be surrendered to 12        local law enforcement within 24 hours of service of 13        the order of protection. Any Firearm Owner's 14        Identification Card or Concealed Carry License in the 15        possession of the respondent, except as provided in 16        subparagraph (B), shall also be ordered by the court 17        to be turned over to the officer serving the order of 18        protection at the time of service or, if not on the 19        respondent's person or at the location where the 20        respondent is served at the time of service, to local 21        law enforcement within 24 hours of service of the 22        order of protection. The law enforcement agency shall 23        immediately mail the card, as well as any license, to 24        the Illinois State Police Firearm Owner's 25        Identification Card Office for safekeeping. 26            (A-1)(i) Upon issuance of an emergency, interim,   SB3020 Enrolled- 73 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        or plenary order of protection and subject to the 2        provisions of item (ii) of this subparagraph (A-1), 3        the court shall issue a search warrant for the seizure 4        of any firearms or firearm parts that could be 5        assembled to make an operable firearm belonging to the 6        respondent if the court, based upon sworn testimony, 7        finds that: 8                (aa) the respondent poses a credible threat to 9            the physical safety of the petitioner protected by 10            the order of protection; and 11                (bb) probable cause exists to believe that:12                    (I) the respondent possesses firearms or 13                firearm parts that could be assembled to make 14                an operable firearm;15                    (II) the firearms or firearm parts that 16                could be assembled to make an operable firearm 17                are located at the residence, vehicle, or 18                other property of the respondent to be 19                searched; and20                    (III) the credible threat to the physical 21                safety of the petitioner protected by the 22                order of protection is immediate and present. 23            The record shall reflect the court's findings in 24        determining whether the search warrant shall be 25        issued. 26            (ii) If the petitioner does not seek a warrant   SB3020 Enrolled- 74 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        under this subparagraph (A-1) or the court determines 2        that the requirements of this subparagraph (A-1) have 3        not been met, relief under subparagraph (A) alone may 4        be granted. 5            (iii) An ex parte search warrant shall be granted 6        under this subparagraph (A-1) only if the court finds 7        that:8                (aa) the elements of item (i) of subparagraph 9            (A-1) have been met;10                (bb) personal injury to the petitioner is 11            likely to occur if the respondent received prior 12            notice; and13                (cc) the petitioner has otherwise satisfied 14            the requirements of Section 217 of this Act. 15            (iv) Oral testimony is sufficient in lieu of an 16        affidavit to support a finding of probable cause. 17            (v) A search warrant issued under this 18        subparagraph (A-1) shall be directed by the court for 19        enforcement to the law enforcement agency with primary 20        responsibility for responding to calls for service at 21        the location to be searched or to another appropriate 22        law enforcement agency if justified by the 23        circumstances. The search warrant shall specify with 24        particularity the scope of the search, including the 25        property to be searched, and shall direct the law 26        enforcement agency to seize the respondent's firearms   SB3020 Enrolled- 75 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        and firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 2        operable firearm. Law enforcement shall also be 3        directed to seize any Firearm Owner's Identification 4        Card and any Concealed Carry License belonging to the 5        respondent.6             (vi) The petitioner shall prepare an information 7        sheet, reviewed by the court, for law enforcement at 8        the time the warrant is granted. The information sheet 9        shall include:10                (aa) contact information for the petitioner, 11            the petitioner's attorney, or both, including a 12            telephone number and email, if available;13                (bb) a physical description of the respondent, 14            including the respondent's date of birth, if 15            known, or approximate age, height, weight, race, 16            and hair color;17                (cc) days and times that the respondent is 18            likely to be at the property to be searched, if 19            known; and20                (dd) whether people other than the respondent 21            are likely to be present at the property to be 22            searched and when, if known. 23            (vii) The information sheet shall be transmitted 24        to the law enforcement agency to which the search 25        warrant is directed in the same manner as the warrant 26        is transmitted under Section 222 of this Act.   SB3020 Enrolled- 76 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1            (viii) If the court, after determining a search 2        warrant should issue, finds that the petitioner has 3        made a credible report of domestic violence to the 4        local law enforcement agency within the previous 90 5        days, law enforcement shall execute the warrant no 6        later than 96 hours after receipt of the warrant. If 7        the court finds that petitioner has not made such a 8        report, the law enforcement agency to which the court 9        has directed the warrant shall, within 48 hours of 10        receipt, evaluate the warrant and seek any corrections 11        to the warrant, and, if applicable, add to or negate 12        the warrant. The record shall reflect the court's 13        findings in determining whether to correct, add, or 14        negate the warrant. If a change is made regarding the 15        search warrant, law enforcement shall execute the 16        warrant no later than 96 hours after the correction is 17        issued. The law enforcement agency shall notify the 18        petitioner of any changes to the warrant or if the 19        warrant has been negated. The law enforcement agency 20        to which the court has directed the warrant may 21        coordinate with other law enforcement agencies to 22        execute the warrant. A return of the warrant shall be 23        filed by the law enforcement agency within 24 hours of 24        execution, setting forth the time, date, and location 25        where the warrant was executed and what items, if any, 26        were seized. If the court is not in session, the return   SB3020 Enrolled- 77 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        information shall be returned on the next date the 2        court is in session. Subject to the provisions of this 3        Section, peace officers shall have the same authority 4        to execute a warrant issued pursuant to this 5        subsection as a warrant issued under Article 108 of 6        the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963. 7            (ix) Upon discovering a defect in the search 8        warrant, the appropriate law enforcement agency may 9        petition the court to correct the warrant. The law 10        enforcement agency shall notify the petitioner of any 11        such correction. 12            (x) Upon petition by the appropriate law 13        enforcement agency, the court may modify the search 14        warrant or extend the time to execute the search 15        warrant for a period of no more than 96 hours. In 16        determining whether to modify or extend the warrant, 17        the court shall consider:18                (aa) any increased risk to the petitioner's 19            safety that may result from a modification or 20            extension of the warrant;21                (bb) any unnecessary risk to law enforcement 22            that would be mitigated by a modification or 23            extension of the warrant;24                (cc) any risks to third parties at the 25            location to be searched that would be mitigated by 26            a modification or extension of the warrant; and  SB3020 Enrolled- 78 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1                (dd) the likelihood of successful execution of 2            warrant.3            The record shall reflect the court's findings in 4        determining whether to extend or modify the warrant. 5        The law enforcement agency shall notify the petitioner 6        of any modification or extension of the warrant. 7            (xi) Service of any order of protection shall, to 8        the extent possible, be concurrent with the execution 9        of any search warrant under this paragraph. 10            (B) If the respondent is a peace officer as 11        defined in Section 2-13 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 12        the court shall order that any firearms used by the 13        respondent in the performance of his or her duties as a 14        peace officer be surrendered to the chief law 15        enforcement executive of the agency in which the 16        respondent is employed, who shall retain the firearms 17        for safekeeping for the duration of the order of 18        protection.19            (C)(i) Any firearms or firearm parts that could be 20        assembled to make an operable firearm shall be kept by 21        the law enforcement agency that took possession of the 22        items for safekeeping, except as provided in 23        subparagraph (B). The period of safekeeping shall be 24        for the duration of the order of protection. Except as 25        provided in subparagraph (E), the respondent is 26        prohibited from transferring firearms or firearm parts   SB3020 Enrolled- 79 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        to another individual in lieu of surrender to law 2        enforcement. The law enforcement agency shall provide 3        an itemized statement of receipt to the respondent and 4        the court describing any seized or surrendered 5        firearms or firearm parts and informing the respondent 6        that the respondent may seek the return of the 7        respondent's items at the end of the order of 8        protection. The law enforcement agency may enter 9        arrangements, as needed, with federally licensed 10        firearm dealers or other law enforcement agencies for 11        the storage of any firearms seized or surrendered 12        under this subsection.13            (ii) It is the respondent's responsibility to 14        request the return or reinstatement of any Firearm 15        Owner's Identification Card or Concealed Carry License 16        and notify the Illinois State Police Firearm Owner's 17        Identification Card Office at the end of the Order of 18        Protection.19            (iii) At the end of the order of protection, a 20        respondent may request the return of any seized or 21        surrendered firearms or firearm parts that could be 22        assembled to make an operable firearm. Such firearms 23        or firearm parts shall be returned within 14 days of 24        the request to the respondent, if the respondent is 25        lawfully eligible to possess firearms, or to a 26        designated third party who is lawfully eligible to   SB3020 Enrolled- 80 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        possess firearms. If the firearms or firearm parts 2        cannot be returned to respondent because (1) the 3        respondent has not requested the return or transfer of 4        the firearms or firearm parts as set forth in this 5        subparagraph, and (2) the respondent cannot be located 6        or fails to respond to more than 3 requests to retrieve 7        the firearms or firearm parts the court may, or is not 8        lawfully eligible to possess a firearm, upon petition 9        from the appropriate law enforcement agency and notice 10        to the respondent at the respondent's last known 11        address, order the law enforcement agency to destroy 12        the firearms or firearm parts; use the firearms or 13        firearm parts for training purposes or for any other 14        application as deemed appropriate by the law 15        enforcement agency; or turn over the firearm or 16        firearm parts to a third party who is lawfully 17        eligible to possess firearms, and who does not reside 18        with respondent. 19            (D)(i) If a person other than the respondent 20        claims title to any firearms and firearm parts that 21        could be assembled to make an operable firearm seized 22        or surrendered under this subsection, the person may 23        petition the court to have the firearm and firearm 24        parts that could be assembled to make an operable 25        firearm returned to him or her with proper notice to 26        the petitioner and respondent. If, at a hearing on the   SB3020 Enrolled- 81 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        petition, the court determines the person to be the 2        lawful owner of the firearm and firearm parts that 3        could be assembled to make an operable firearm, the 4        firearm and firearm parts that could be assembled to 5        make an operable firearm shall be returned to the 6        person, provided that: 7                (aa) the firearm and firearm parts that could 8            be assembled to make an operable firearm are 9            removed from the respondent's custody, control, or 10            possession and the lawful owner agrees to store 11            the firearm and firearm parts that could be 12            assembled to make an operable firearm in a manner 13            such that the respondent does not have access to 14            or control of the firearm and firearm parts that 15            could be assembled to make an operable firearm; 16            and17                 (bb) the firearm and firearm parts that could 18            be assembled to make an operable firearm are not 19            otherwise unlawfully possessed by the owner. 20            (ii) The person petitioning for the return of his 21        or her firearm and firearm parts that could be 22        assembled to make an operable firearm must swear or 23        affirm by affidavit that he or she:24                (aa) is the lawful owner of the firearm and 25            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 26            operable firearm;  SB3020 Enrolled- 82 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1                (bb) shall not transfer the firearm and 2            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 3            operable firearm to the respondent; and4                (cc) will store the firearm and firearm parts 5            that could be assembled to make an operable 6            firearm in a manner that the respondent does not 7            have access to or control of the firearm and 8            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 9            operable firearm. 10            (E)(i) The respondent may file a motion to 11        transfer, at the next scheduled hearing, any seized or 12        surrendered firearms or firearm parts to a third 13        party. Notice of the motion shall be provided to the 14        petitioner and the third party must appear at the 15        hearing. 16            (ii) The court may order transfer of the seized or 17        surrendered firearm or firearm parts only if:18                (aa) the third party transferee affirms by 19            affidavit to the open court that: 20                    (I) the third party transferee does not 21                reside with the respondent; 22                    (II) the respondent does not have access 23                to the location in which the third party 24                transferee intends to keep the firearms or 25                firearm parts; 26                    (III) the third party transferee will not   SB3020 Enrolled- 83 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1                transfer the firearm or firearm parts to the 2                respondent or anyone who resides with the 3                respondent; 4                    (IV) the third party transferee will 5                maintain control and possession of the firearm 6                or firearm parts until otherwise ordered by 7                the court; and 8                    (V) the third party transferee will be 9                subject to criminal penalties for transferring 10                the firearms or firearm parts to the 11                respondent; and 12                (bb) the court finds that: 13                    (I) the respondent holds a valid Firearm 14                Owner's Identification; and15                    (II) the transfer of firearms or firearm 16                parts to the third party transferee does not 17                place the petitioner or any other protected 18                parties at any additional threat or risk of 19                harm. 20        (15) Prohibition of access to records. If an order of 21    protection prohibits respondent from having contact with 22    the minor child, or if petitioner's address is omitted 23    under subsection (b) of Section 203, or if necessary to 24    prevent abuse or wrongful removal or concealment of a 25    minor child, the order shall deny respondent access to, 26    and prohibit respondent from inspecting, obtaining, or   SB3020 Enrolled- 84 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    attempting to inspect or obtain, school or any other 2    records of the minor child who is in the care of 3    petitioner.4        (16) Order for payment of shelter services. Order 5    respondent to reimburse a shelter providing temporary 6    housing and counseling services to the petitioner for the 7    cost of the services, as certified by the shelter and 8    deemed reasonable by the court.9        (17) Order for injunctive relief. Enter injunctive 10    relief necessary or appropriate to prevent further abuse 11    of a family or household member or further abuse, neglect, 12    or exploitation of a high-risk adult with disabilities or 13    to effectuate one of the granted remedies, if supported by 14    the balance of hardships. If the harm to be prevented by 15    the injunction is abuse or any other harm that one of the 16    remedies listed in paragraphs (1) through (16) of this 17    subsection is designed to prevent, no further evidence is 18    necessary that the harm is an irreparable injury.19        (18) Telephone services.20            (A) Unless a condition described in subparagraph 21        (B) of this paragraph exists, the court may, upon 22        request by the petitioner, order a wireless telephone 23        service provider to transfer to the petitioner the 24        right to continue to use a telephone number or numbers 25        indicated by the petitioner and the financial 26        responsibility associated with the number or numbers,   SB3020 Enrolled- 85 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        as set forth in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph. 2        For purposes of this paragraph (18), the term 3        "wireless telephone service provider" means a provider 4        of commercial mobile service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 5        332. The petitioner may request the transfer of each 6        telephone number that the petitioner, or a minor child 7        in his or her custody, uses. The clerk of the court 8        shall serve the order on the wireless telephone 9        service provider's agent for service of process 10        provided to the Illinois Commerce Commission. The 11        order shall contain all of the following:12                (i) The name and billing telephone number of 13            the account holder including the name of the 14            wireless telephone service provider that serves 15            the account.16                (ii) Each telephone number that will be 17            transferred.18                (iii) A statement that the provider transfers 19            to the petitioner all financial responsibility for 20            and right to the use of any telephone number 21            transferred under this paragraph.22            (B) A wireless telephone service provider shall 23        terminate the respondent's use of, and shall transfer 24        to the petitioner use of, the telephone number or 25        numbers indicated in subparagraph (A) of this 26        paragraph unless it notifies the petitioner, within 72   SB3020 Enrolled- 86 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        hours after it receives the order, that one of the 2        following applies:3                (i) The account holder named in the order has 4            terminated the account.5                (ii) A difference in network technology would 6            prevent or impair the functionality of a device on 7            a network if the transfer occurs.8                (iii) The transfer would cause a geographic or 9            other limitation on network or service provision 10            to the petitioner.11                (iv) Another technological or operational 12            issue would prevent or impair the use of the 13            telephone number if the transfer occurs.14            (C) The petitioner assumes all financial 15        responsibility for and right to the use of any 16        telephone number transferred under this paragraph. In 17        this paragraph, "financial responsibility" includes 18        monthly service costs and costs associated with any 19        mobile device associated with the number.20            (D) A wireless telephone service provider may 21        apply to the petitioner its routine and customary 22        requirements for establishing an account or 23        transferring a number, including requiring the 24        petitioner to provide proof of identification, 25        financial information, and customer preferences.26            (E) Except for willful or wanton misconduct, a   SB3020 Enrolled- 87 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1        wireless telephone service provider is immune from 2        civil liability for its actions taken in compliance 3        with a court order issued under this paragraph.4            (F) All wireless service providers that provide 5        services to residential customers shall provide to the 6        Illinois Commerce Commission the name and address of 7        an agent for service of orders entered under this 8        paragraph (18). Any change in status of the registered 9        agent must be reported to the Illinois Commerce 10        Commission within 30 days of such change. 11            (G) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall 12        maintain the list of registered agents for service for 13        each wireless telephone service provider on the 14        Commission's website. The Commission may consult with 15        wireless telephone service providers and the Circuit 16        Court Clerks on the manner in which this information 17        is provided and displayed.18        (19) Removal of harassing materials, tracking, or 19    monitoring. Order respondent to remove or delete and take 20    reasonable steps to remove or delete the harassing 21    statements or materials or delete the tracking and 22    monitoring information collected by the respondent and 23    produce sufficient evidence that such compliance has 24    occurred. 25    (c) Relevant factors; findings.26        (1) In determining whether to grant a specific remedy,   SB3020 Enrolled- 88 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    other than payment of support, the court shall consider 2    relevant factors, including but not limited to the 3    following:4            (i) the nature, frequency, severity, pattern and 5        consequences of the respondent's past abuse, neglect 6        or exploitation of the petitioner or any family or 7        household member, including the concealment of his or 8        her location in order to evade service of process or 9        notice, and the likelihood of danger of future abuse, 10        neglect, or exploitation to petitioner or any member 11        of petitioner's or respondent's family or household; 12        and13            (ii) the danger that any minor child will be 14        abused or neglected or improperly relocated from the 15        jurisdiction, improperly concealed within the State or 16        improperly separated from the child's primary 17        caretaker.18        (2) In comparing relative hardships resulting to the 19    parties from loss of possession of the family home, the 20    court shall consider relevant factors, including but not 21    limited to the following:22            (i) availability, accessibility, cost, safety, 23        adequacy, location and other characteristics of 24        alternate housing for each party and any minor child 25        or dependent adult in the party's care;26            (ii) the effect on the party's employment; and  SB3020 Enrolled- 89 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1            (iii) the effect on the relationship of the party, 2        and any minor child or dependent adult in the party's 3        care, to family, school, church and community.4        (3) Subject to the exceptions set forth in paragraph 5    (4) of this subsection, the court shall make its findings 6    in an official record or in writing, and shall at a minimum 7    set forth the following:8            (i) That the court has considered the applicable 9        relevant factors described in paragraphs (1) and (2) 10        of this subsection.11            (ii) Whether the conduct or actions of respondent, 12        unless prohibited, will likely cause irreparable harm 13        or continued abuse.14            (iii) Whether it is necessary to grant the 15        requested relief in order to protect petitioner or 16        other alleged abused persons.17        (4) For purposes of issuing an ex parte emergency 18    order of protection, the court, as an alternative to or as 19    a supplement to making the findings described in 20    paragraphs (c)(3)(i) through (c)(3)(iii) of this 21    subsection, may use the following procedure:22        When a verified petition for an emergency order of 23    protection in accordance with the requirements of Sections 24    203 and 217 is presented to the court, the court shall 25    examine petitioner on oath or affirmation. An emergency 26    order of protection shall be issued by the court if it   SB3020 Enrolled- 90 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    appears from the contents of the petition and the 2    examination of petitioner that the averments are 3    sufficient to indicate abuse by respondent and to support 4    the granting of relief under the issuance of the emergency 5    order of protection.6        (5) Never married parties. No rights or 7    responsibilities for a minor child born outside of 8    marriage attach to a putative father until a father and 9    child relationship has been established under the Illinois 10    Parentage Act of 1984, the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, 11    the Illinois Public Aid Code, Section 12 of the Vital 12    Records Act, the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, the Probate 13    Act of 1975, the Revised Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of 14    Support Act, the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, 15    the Expedited Child Support Act of 1990, any judicial, 16    administrative, or other act of another state or 17    territory, any other Illinois statute, or by any foreign 18    nation establishing the father and child relationship, any 19    other proceeding substantially in conformity with the 20    Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity 21    Reconciliation Act of 1996 (Pub. L. 104-193), or where 22    both parties appeared in open court or at an 23    administrative hearing acknowledging under oath or 24    admitting by affirmation the existence of a father and 25    child relationship. Absent such an adjudication, finding, 26    or acknowledgment, no putative father shall be granted   SB3020 Enrolled- 91 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    temporary allocation of parental responsibilities, 2    including parenting time with the minor child, or physical 3    care and possession of the minor child, nor shall an order 4    of payment for support of the minor child be entered.5    (d) Balance of hardships; findings. If the court finds 6that the balance of hardships does not support the granting of 7a remedy governed by paragraph (2), (3), (10), (11), or (16) of 8subsection (b) of this Section, which may require such 9balancing, the court's findings shall so indicate and shall 10include a finding as to whether granting the remedy will 11result in hardship to respondent that would substantially 12outweigh the hardship to petitioner from denial of the remedy. 13The findings shall be an official record or in writing.14    (e) Denial of remedies. Denial of any remedy shall not be 15based, in whole or in part, on evidence that:16        (1) Respondent has cause for any use of force, unless 17    that cause satisfies the standards for justifiable use of 18    force provided by Article 7 of the Criminal Code of 2012;19        (2) Respondent was voluntarily intoxicated;20        (3) Petitioner acted in self-defense or defense of 21    another, provided that, if petitioner utilized force, such 22    force was justifiable under Article 7 of the Criminal Code 23    of 2012; 24        (4) Petitioner did not act in self-defense or defense 25    of another;26        (5) Petitioner left the residence or household to   SB3020 Enrolled- 92 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    avoid further abuse, neglect, or exploitation by 2    respondent;3        (6) Petitioner did not leave the residence or 4    household to avoid further abuse, neglect, or exploitation 5    by respondent;6        (7) Conduct by any family or household member excused 7    the abuse, neglect, or exploitation by respondent, unless 8    that same conduct would have excused such abuse, neglect, 9    or exploitation if the parties had not been family or 10    household members.11(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-1065, eff. 5-11-25.) 12    (750 ILCS 60/220)  (from Ch. 40, par. 2312-20)13    Sec. 220. Duration and extension of orders. 14    (a) Duration of emergency and interim orders. Unless 15re-opened or extended or voided by entry of an order of greater 16duration:17        (1) Emergency orders issued under Section 217 shall be 18    effective for not less than 14 nor more than 21 days;19        (2) Interim orders shall be effective for up to 30 20    days.21    (b) Duration of plenary orders.22        (0.05) A plenary order of protection entered under 23    this Act shall be valid for a fixed period of time, not to 24    exceed two years.25        (1) A plenary order of protection entered in   SB3020 Enrolled- 93 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    conjunction with another civil proceeding shall remain in 2    effect as follows:3            (i) if entered as preliminary relief in that other 4        proceeding, until entry of final judgment in that 5        other proceeding;6            (ii) if incorporated into the final judgment in 7        that other proceeding, until the order of protection 8        is vacated or modified; or9            (iii) if incorporated in an order for involuntary 10        commitment, until termination of both the involuntary 11        commitment and any voluntary commitment, or for a 12        fixed period of time not exceeding 2 years.13        (2) Duration of an order of protection entered in 14    conjunction with a criminal prosecution or delinquency 15    petition shall remain in effect as provided in Section 16    112A-20 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963.17    (c) Computation of time. The duration of an order of 18protection shall not be reduced by the duration of any prior 19order of protection.20    (d) Law enforcement records. When a plenary order of 21protection expires upon the occurrence of a specified event, 22rather than upon a specified date as provided in subsection 23(b), no expiration date shall be entered in Illinois State 24Police records. To remove the plenary order from those 25records, either party shall request the clerk of the court to 26file a certified copy of an order stating that the specified   SB3020 Enrolled- 94 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1event has occurred or that the plenary order has been vacated 2or modified with the Sheriff, and the Sheriff shall direct 3that law enforcement records shall be promptly corrected in 4accordance with the filed order.5    (e) Extension of orders. 6        (1) Emergency and Interim orders. Any emergency, 7    interim or plenary order may be extended one or more 8    times, as required, provided that the requirements of 9    Section 217, 218 or 219, as appropriate, are satisfied. A 10    violation of the original order or a subsequent incident 11    of abuse is not required to grant an extension of the 12    order.13        (2) Plenary orders.14            (A) The court shall grant the petitioner's motion 15        to extend a plenary order of protection if the 16        requirements of Section 219 have been satisfied and 17        there has been no material change in the relevant 18        circumstances. The court shall not deny a motion to 19        extend solely because there is no violation of the 20        original order nor a subsequent incident of abuse.21            (B) An extension of a plenary order may be granted 22        for any fixed period of time or until the order is 23        vacated or modified. If the petitioner seeks an 24        extension longer than 2 years, the court may grant 25        such request if it finds that there is good cause to 26        extend the order for longer than 2 years.  SB3020 Enrolled- 95 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1            (C) If respondent does not contest the motion to 2        extend a plenary order of protection, after service of 3        the motion in accordance with Supreme Court Rules 11, 4        12, and 105, the court may grant the request for an 5        extension based solely on the petitioner's motion and 6        affidavit setting forth the requirements of this 7        paragraph (2).8            (D) If the plenary order is set to expire before 9        the next available court date, then the court date for 10        extension must be expedited. The court may extend the 11        order on an emergency basis pending a hearing on the 12        request. If a plenary order expires prior to a hearing 13        on the motion, the court may reinstate and extend the 14        order upon hearing. 15    If the motion for extension is uncontested and petitioner 16seeks no modification of the order, the order may be extended 17on the basis of petitioner's motion or affidavit stating that 18there has been no material change in relevant circumstances 19since entry of the order and stating the reason for the 20requested extension. An extension of a plenary order of 21protection may be granted, upon good cause shown, to remain in 22effect until the order of protection is vacated or modified. 23    (3) Extensions under this subsection (e) may be granted 24only in open court and not under the provisions of subsection 25(c) of Section 217, which applies only when the court is 26unavailable at the close of business or on a court holiday.  SB3020 Enrolled- 96 -LRB104 17995 RLC 31432 b1    (f) Termination date. Any order of protection which would 2expire on a court holiday shall instead expire at the close of 3the next court business day.4    (g) Statement of purpose. The practice of dismissing or 5suspending a criminal prosecution in exchange for the issuance 6of an order of protection undermines the purposes of this Act. 7This Section shall not be construed as encouraging that 8practice.9(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)